


AeroVironment's (AVAV) CEO Wahid Nawabi on Q4 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»AeroVironment's (AVAV) CEO Wahid Nawabi on Q4 2017 Results - Earnings Call TranscriptJun.27.17 | About: AeroVironment, Inc. (AVAV) AeroVironment Inc (NASDAQ:AVAV)
Q4 2017 Earnings Conference Call
June 27, 2017 04:30 PM ET
Executives
Steven Gitlin - VP Investor Relations
Wahid Nawabi - Chief Executive Officer
Teresa Covington - Chief Financial Officer
Analysts
Joseph De Nardi - Stifel
Greg Konrad - Jefferies
Peter Armand - Baird
Nick Johnson - Piper Jaffray
Operator
Good day, ladies and gentlemen. Welcome to the AeroVironment Incorporated Fourth Quarter and Full Fiscal 2017 Earnings Call. At this time, all participants are in a listen-only mode. We will conduct a question-and-answer session after management’s remarks. As a reminder, this conference is being recorded for replay purposes.
With us today from the Company is the President and Chief Executive Officer, Mr. Wahid Nawabi; Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer, Ms. Teresa Covington; and Vice President of Investor Relations, Mr. Steven Gitlin.
And now at this time, I would like to turn the conference over to Mr. Gitlin. Please go ahead, sir.
Steven Gitlin
Thank you, Chelsey, welcome to AeroVironment's fourth quarter and full fiscal 2017 earnings call. Please note that on this call, certain information presented contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Forward-looking statements include without limitation, any statement that may predict, forecast, indicate or imply future results, performance or achievements, and may contain words such as believe, anticipate, expect, estimate, intend, project, plan, or words or phrases with similar meaning.
Forward-looking statements are based on current expectations, forecasts and assumptions that involve risks and uncertainties, including, but not limited to, economic, competitive, governmental and technological factors outside of our control, that may cause our business, strategy or actual results to differ materially from the forward-looking statements.
Factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from the forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, reliance on sales to the U.S. government; availability of U.S. government funding for defense procurement and R&D programs; changes in the timing and/or amount of government spending; risks related to our international business including compliance with export control laws, potential need for changes in our long-term strategy in response to future developments; the extensive regulatory requirements governing our contracts with the United States Government and international customers, the consequences to our financial position, business and reputation that could result from failing to comply with such regulatory requirements, unexpected technical and marketing difficulties inherent in major research and product development efforts; the impact of potential security and cyber threats; changes in the supply and/or demand and/or prices for our products and services; the activities of competitors and increased competition; failure of the markets in which we operate to grow; uncertainty in the customer adoption rate of commercial unmanned aircraft systems and electric vehicles, failure to remain a market innovator and create new market opportunities; changes in significant operating expenses, including components and raw materials; failure to develop new products; product liability, infringement and other claims; changes in the regulatory environment; and general economic and business conditions in the United States and elsewhere in the world.
For a further list and description of such risks and uncertainties, see the reports we file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The content of this conference call contains time sensitive information that is accurate only as of today, June 27, 2017. The Company undertakes no obligation to make any revision to the statements contained in our remarks or to update them to reflect the events or circumstances occurring after this conference call.

Let's begin with remarks from Wahid Nawabi. Wahid?
Wahid Nawabi
Thank you, Steve. Our three main messages today are as follows; First, our business remains strong and profitable and our team achieved our exceeded our financial objectives for fiscal 2017, second we made good progress on our fiscal 2017 milestones that maintained the leading market positions in our core business and advance our differentiated solutions for large new global opportunities and our growth portfolio, and third we remain on track for long term value creation.
On today's call, I will provide a summary of fourth quarter and full year financial performance and will review our achievements in fiscal 2017. Teresa Covington will provide a more detailed review of our financials before I share with you our goals for fiscal 2018. Teresa, Steve and I will then take your questions.
When I assumed the role as AeroVironment's Chief Executive Officer a little more than a year ago I was confident we were well positioned to execute our strategy successfully, drive value for shareholders and provide our customers more actionable intelligence so they can proceed with certainty. To troops on the front line, that certainty can mean the difference between life and death. To businesses it can mean helping to ensure their financial prosperity.
Our core business is strong with leading market positions and the ability to generate attractive returns and our growth portfolio is compelling with the highly differentiated solutions we've been developing for launch into large new global market opportunities. Achieving these opportunities requires planning, when we developed our fiscal 2017 plan customer order timing resulted in a heavily weighted fiscal fourth quarter, thanks to the support and dedication of our amazing team we delivered record fourth quarter results as follows.
Revenue of $125 million, an increase of 48% year-over-year. Operating income of $34 million, an increase of nearly 400% year-over-year and fully diluted earnings per share of $1.30, an increase of more than 450% from the prior year. Our outstanding fourth quarter performance combined with careful operating expense management throughout the year produced full year revenue of $264.9 million, a small increase over fiscal 2016 and fully diluted earnings per share of 40 -- $0.54, well above our guidance and a 36% increase year-over-year.
Gross margin decrease partly the result of our one-time reserve reversal in fiscal 2016 and partly due to higher sustaining expenses. Our focus on operating expense management more than offset low gross margin to produce operating income of $12.5 million, a 29% increase over last year. Our expense management included reducing internal R&D investments from 16% of revenue in fiscal 2016 to 12% of revenue in fiscal 2017, as we consistently communicated to you throughout the year.
In addition to our financial performance we achieved nearly all of the objectives for fiscal 2017 that we shared with you a year ago and we emerged even better positioned for long term value creation than before. At the beginning of fiscal 2017 I shared with you our 10 key milestones for the year which I will now report on. We continued the expansion of our domestic small UAS business through sustainment and upgrades, deliveries that support potential U.S. Army procurement programs and promising U.S. Navy adoption.
We began shipments of Mantis i45 sensors to DoD customers for Puma AE upgrades at the end of fiscal 2017. The i45 sensors suite delivers unparalleled imaging capabilities for small UAS and has the potential to drive its own significant upgrade cycle among Puma AE customers. We also improved our positioning for U.S. army soldier born sensor competition with our next generation pocketable Snipe unmanned aircraft system including completing shipment of our first 30 systems for customer evaluation. And we continue to demonstrate effective small UAS capabilities aboard naval vessels to drive further navel adoption of our solutions.

We extended out international small UAS installed base with existing and new customers. Small UAS constitutes the majority of air environments international revenue which grew from 28% to 36% of company revenue in fiscal 2017, or from about $70 million to nearly $90 million. We offered a comprehensive solution that appeals to our international customers and they are procuring one or more products from our family of small UAS as well as multiyear services such as training and repairs.
Some of these customers are even using our systems 24/7 relying heavily on them to protect their forces and pushing the extreme capabilities of our unmanned solutions. AeroVironment is without question helping these customers proceed with certainty with very high stakes on the line. This integrated family of systems has helped to score increased adoption across a broader geographic range from western to eastern Europe from the middle east to Asia and Oceana expanding our list of allied customers to more than 40 countries.
New UAS customers in fiscal 2017 included [indiscernible] and three other NATO and Middle East countries. As an example of family of systems adoption in October we announced a $10.3 million contract with the Netherlands for digital upgrades to their existing Raven fleet and for new Wasp AE and Puma AE systems. On June 1st, we announced that the Australian defense force selected our Wasp AE for small UAS program. We anticipate more multiyear contracts from international customers ahead as our installed base grows and we create more opportunities to build recurring revenue streams from sustainment services and upgrades.
We continued to progress toward the U.S. DoD frequency relocation program for small UAS winning an initial contract that we believe positions us well for follow on work expected this fiscal year. The strategic investments we have been making to build our TMS business continue to deliver results. In fiscal 2011, our TMS revenue was about $6 million, growing to more than $40 million in fiscal 2016.
In fiscal 2017, TMS revenue grew to more than $75 million an increase of more than 80% over the previous year. From fiscal 2011 this represents a compound annual growth rate of 56%. As you can see the returns on our strategic incremental TMS investments of previous years are very positive. TMS now accounts for 29% of total company revenue. We continue to build our family of tactical missile systems to address the important needs of a growing number of customers and we continue to successfully deliver Switchblade systems to our U.S. government customers.
In October, we announced a $22.8 million contract from the U.S. army for Switchblade systems, which strengthens our position as the leader in Loitering Munitions, one type of the tactical missile systems.
In fiscal 2017, we deployed Blackwing systems for use on navy submarines, with very positive results, an encouraging milestone on the path towards long-term adoption into a navy program of record. Still within our TMS business progress continued on our multiple Switchblade variance including production and delivery of one variant --.
[Technical Difficulty]
Operator
[Operator Instructions] You may resume.
Steven Gitlin
Thank you very much. This is Steve Gitlin, and we again we apologize for whatever technical issues cut our call off. So Wahid is going to start a little bit earlier in the script, apologies if there is some repetition here, but we want to make sure that you're tracking with his prepared comments.
Wahid Nawabi
Thank you, Steve. We continue to progress towards the U.S. view of this frequency relocation program for small UAS winning an initial contract that we believe positions us well for follow on work expected this fiscal year. The strategic investments we've been making to build our TMS business continue to deliver results. In fiscal 2011 our TMS revenue was about $6 million growing to more than $40 million in fiscal 2016. In fiscal 2017 TMS revenue grew to more than $75 million an increase of more than 80% over the previous year. From fiscal 2011 this represents a compound annual growth rate of 56%. As you can see the returns on our strategic incremental TMS investments of previous years are very positive. TMS now accounts for 29% of total company revenue.

We continue to build out our family of tactical missile systems to address the important needs of a growing number of customers and we continue to successfully deliver Switchblade systems to our U.S. government customers.
In October we announced a $22.8 million contract from the U.S. Army for Switchblade systems, which strengthens our position as the leader in Loitering Munitions, one type of tactical missile system. In fiscal 2017, we deployed Blackwing systems for use on Navy submarines with very positive results an encouraging milestone on the path toward long term adoption into a Navy program of record.
Still within our TMS business progress continued on our multiple Switchblade variants including production and delivery of one variant and further development of others. Nearly half of our fiscal 2017 TMS revenue comes in the form of customer funded research and development. While customer funded R&D is usually lower margin business structured and costs plus contracts it’s also a strong indicator of customer engagement that generally leads to higher margin product revenue in subsequent years. 
Additionally, we are demonstrating effective counter UAF capabilities that have the potential to protect troops from the growing threat of lethal drones operated by our adversaries. In our commercial information solutions business, we unveiled our innovative Quantix drone, an AV decision support system analytics platform, shared news about important and relevant research with Fresno State University and made continued progress with early adopter customers and multiple industries.
In April we performed an important demonstration with Legado Networks, Dominion Virginia Power and Virginia Tech. During this event we flew our Puma AE system up to 14 miles away from its operator along power lines using Legado's satellite and terrestrial capabilities to maintain communication and control.
This demonstration illustrated a safe and effective approach to controlling drones and beyond visual line of sight operation. This type of capability will be critical towards maximizing the economic benefits of drones in commercial applications. Additionally, we achieved further engagement with potential customers for atmospheric satellite systems.
In our EES business we grew revenue by 18% year over year and accelerated our global EV charging strategy by winning a contract with Volvo to support their plug-in vehicle rollout in Europe and China which we announced in March. We continue to enjoy strong demand and growth for EV test systems from global OEMs and battery manufacturers particularly in China, North America and South Korea. Our passenger EV charging solutions enjoyed strong unit growth in 2017 and we surpassed 54,000 level two charging systems deployed. Shipments of EVSEs increased sharply over last year as we supported the launch of the Chevrolet Bolt EV.
Outside of North America our multi-year program with Volvo to develop a residential charger for the European, Chinese and North America markets is in progress, building on our next generation EV charging systems architecture and is compatible with 2018 global standards and agency requirements. Also in fiscal 2017, our EVSE-RS system was integrated with eMotorWerks JuiceNet for two utility programs. This development added to our broad portfolio of network integrated charging solutions that demonstrate our adaptability to the evolving EV charging network ecosystem for demand response and vehicle-to-grid applications.
Finally, in EES we began shipping TurboCord level two chargers to a major global German automaker. We made good progress on our continued improvement initiatives, enhancing business processes, quality, our organization, planning and execution. These initiatives have already delivered high customer and employee satisfaction which ultimately contribute to shareholder value. Across our business we achieved our goals in fiscal 2017 and improved our positioning to achieve our long-term growth objectives.

Now I will turn the call over to Teresa to provide more detail on our financial performance in the fourth quarter and for the full fiscal year. Teresa?
Teresa Covington
Thank you, Wahid and good afternoon everyone. AeroVironment's fiscal 2017 fourth quarter results are as follows; Revenue for Q4 was $125.4 million, an increase of $40.6 million or 48% from the fourth quarter of fiscal 2016 revenue of $84.8 million. The increase in revenue resulted from an increase in product sales of $51.5 million, partially offset by a decrease in contract services revenue of $10.8 million.
Looking at revenue by segment, UAS revenue was $115.7 million, an increase of $39.8 million or 52% from the fourth quarter of fiscal 2016 revenue of $75.9 million. The increase was due to an increase in product deliveries of $50.4 million and an increase in service revenue of $2.1 million partially offset by a decrease in customer funded R&D work of $12.7 million. EES revenue was $9.7 million, an increase of $0.8 million or 9% from the fourth quarter of fiscal 2016 revenue of $8.9 million. This increase was primarily due to an increase in product delivery of EV test systems.
Turning to gross margin, gross margin for the fourth quarter was $58.7 million or 47% as compared to $37.9 million or 45% for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2016. The increase in gross margin was primarily due to an increase in product sales margin of $26.5 million partially offset by a decrease in service margins of $5.8 million. By segment, UAS gross margin increased to $56.3 million for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2017 from $35 million. As a percentage of revenue gross margin for UAS increased from 46% to 49% primarily due to an increase in product sales volume and favorable product mix.
EES gross margin decreased $0.6 million to $2.3 million for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2017, primarily due to unfavorable product mix. SG&A expense for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2017 was $16.7 million or 13% of revenue, compared to SG&A expense of $16.8 million or 20% of revenue for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2016.
R&D expense for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2017 was $7.9 million or 6% of revenue, compared to R&D expense of $14.3 million or 17% of revenue for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2016. Operating income for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2017 was $34 million or 27% of revenue compared to operating income of $6.8 million or 8% of revenue for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2016.
The operating income increase was primarily due to higher gross margins of $20.7 million, and a decrease in R&D expense of $6.4 million. Net other income for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2017 was $1 million, compared to the prior year net other income of $0.5 million. During the fourth quarter of fiscal 2017 we acquired an additional equity ownership in our Turkish joint venture Altoy for total proceeds of $625,000 providing us with a controlling interest. As a result, Altoy's financial results have been consolidated into AeroVironment's consolidated financial statements, which resulted in a gain on acquisition of $0.6 million or $0.02 earnings per diluted share.
Our effective income tax rate was 13% for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2017, as compared to an effective income tax rate of 26.4% for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2016. Net income attributable to AeroVironment, for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2017 was $30.5 million or $1.30 earnings per diluted share compared the net income attributable to AeroVironment of $5.4 million or $0.23 earnings per diluted share for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2016.
Now moving through full fiscal year 2017 results, as compared to fiscal year 2016. Revenue for fiscal 2017 was $264.9 million, an increase of $0.8 million as compared to $264.1 million for fiscal 2016. The increase in revenue was due to an increase in product deliveries of $3.9 million, partially offset by a decrease in contract service revenue of $3.1 million.

UAS revenue decreased $4.8 million to $228.9 million for fiscal 2017, primarily due to a decrease in customer funded R&D work of $9.9 million and a decrease in product deliveries of $2.4 million partially offset by an increase in service revenue of $7.5 million. EES revenue increased $5.6 million to $35.9 million for fiscal 2017, primarily due to an increase in product delivery of EV test systems, and passenger EV charging solutions.
Gross margin for fiscal 2017 was $102.2 million or 39% as compared to $112.1 million or 42% for fiscal 2016. The decrease was primarily due to a decrease in product margins of $5.7 million, and a decrease in service margins of $4.3 million. 
UAS gross margin decreased to $93 million for fiscal 2017 from $101.5 million in fiscal 2016. As a percentage of revenue gross margin for UAS decreased from 43% to 41%, primarily due to the reversal for the settlement of prior year government incurred cost audits recorded in the second quarter of fiscal 2016 and an increase in sustaining engineering cost and support of our existing products.
The EES gross margin increased $1.5 million to $9.1 million for fiscal 2017 primarily due to an increase in sustaining engineering cost and support of our existing products and the reverse reversal for the settlement of prior year government incurred cost audits recorded in the second quarter of fiscal 2016, partially offset by the increased sales volumes.
SG&A expense for the fiscal 2017 was $56.5 million or 21% of revenue, compared to SG&A expense of $60.1 million or 23% of revenue for the fiscal 2016. SG&A decreased $3.5 million primarily due to a decrease in bid and proposal cost and a decrease in professional services.
R&D expense for the fiscal 2017 was $33 million or 12% of revenue, compared to R&D expense of $42.3 million or 16% of revenue for the fiscal 2016. The decrease in internal R&D expense was primarily due to a decrease in development activities for certain strategic initiatives. Operating income for fiscal 2017 was $12.5 million or 5% of revenue compared to compared to operating income of $9.7 million or 4% of revenue for the fiscal 2016. The increase in operating income was primarily due to decreases in R&D expense of $9.2 million and SG&A expense of $3.5 million, partially offset by lower gross margins of $10 million.
Net other income for fiscal year 2016 was 1.7 million compared to the prior year net other expense of $1.7 million. Net other income increased primarily due to the recording of an other than temporary impairment loss of our CybAero equity securities during fiscal 2016 and the gain associated with our acquisition of a controlling interest in our Turkish joint venture.
The effected income tax rate for fiscal 2017 was 12.3% compared to the effective income tax rate of minus 11.1% for fiscal 2016. The fiscal 2017 tax rate included a reversal of a reverse of $1 million for uncertain tax positions due to the settlement of prior fiscal year audits.
Net income attributable to AeroVironment for fiscal 2017 was $12.5 million or $0.54 earnings per diluted share compared to net income of $9 million or $0.39 earnings per diluted share for fiscal 2016.
Our funded backlog as of April 30, 2017 was $78 million an increase of $12.2 million or 19% from the fourth quarter of fiscal year of 2016, and the decrease of $56.1 million or 42% from the third quarter of fiscal 2017.
Turning to our balance sheet cash, cash equivalents and investments at the end of fiscal year 2017 totaled $242 million, a decrease of $19.6 million from the end of fiscal 2016. The decrease in cash, cash equivalents and investments was driven by higher working capital requirements of the business with our record fourth quarter revenue. Accounts receivable including unbilled and retention receivables at the end of fiscal year 2017 totaled $88.5 million, an increase of $13.6 million from the end of fiscal year 2016. Total days sales outstanding for fiscal 2017 was approximately 113 days compared to 87 days for fiscal 2016.

Net inventory at the end of fiscal year 2017 was $60.1 million compared to $68.8 million at the end of the prior quarter and $37.5 million at the end of fiscal year 2016. Days in inventory for fiscal year 2017 were approximately 90 days compared to 92 days for fiscal 2016. This increase in inventory dollars was primarily due to an anticipated first half shipment.
Turning to capital expenditures, in the fiscal year 2017 we invested approximately $9.9 million or 4% of revenue in property improvements and capital equipment and recognized $7.1 million of depreciation and amortization expense. Now an update to our fiscal 2018 visibility. As of today we have Q4 ending backlog that we expect to execute in fiscal 2018 of $75 million.
Quarter to date bookings that we anticipate to execute in fiscal 2018 of $17 million, unfunded backlog from incrementally funded contracts that we anticipate to recognize revenue during the balance of the year are $3 million. Revenues needed to hold EES revenues flat relative to last year, up $24 million. This adds up to $120 million, 41% at the midpoint of revenue guidance.
Now I'd like to turn things back to Wahid to discuss AreoVironment's expectations for fiscal year 2018.
Wahid Nawabi
Thanks Teresa. Now I would like to provide a macro view on our industry. Industry trends are favorable for our -- in fiscal 2018. First, the global threat environment remains very dynamic requiring highly capable small military teams that can operate flexibly and effectively in a wide variety of theaters around the globe.
In this environment, organic intelligence surveillance and reconnaissance and precision strike solutions like our small UAS and TMS offer game changing capabilities that help troops obtain the actionable intelligence they need to act decisively and proceed with certainty. Because U.S. forces are not operating alone in these theaters demand from our allies for AeroVironment solutions remained strong as well.
Second, the Federal Government fiscal year 2018 budget request includes procurement line items associated with AeroVironment solutions. The budget request includes approximately $40 million for the U.S. Army, Navy, Marine Corp, US SOCOMM and for the first time Coast Guard and customs and border patrol programs seeking AeroVironment's small UAS or tactical missile systems.
Third, our international footprint continues to grow with an increasing number of new international customers. We now count more than 40 countries outside of the U.S. as customers for a family of small UAS.
Similarly, our family of tactical missile systems footprint among U.S. customers continues to advance with strong pulls from the unique and game changing capabilities these systems offer and the highly dynamic threat environment. In our DoD small UAS market we see incremental opportunities and upgrades, the Soldier Borne Sensor or SBS program in frequency relocation, combined with growing international demand for our family of small UAS we see healthy opportunities for us in this core part of our business.
As for our growth portfolio in TMS Switchblade and its variants not only represent our second largest business but also continue to improve our positioning for an annual domestic opportunity that we estimate exceeds $1 billion in value. In CIS, we're poised to make the next step in our plan to enter that what could be a multibillion dollar global market opportunity.
Looking ahead we're focused on building on our 2017 success and accomplishing 2018 objectives which I will now outline. First, increasing our small UAS footprint in domestic and international markets, continuing strong multi-year international revenue momentum, winning the U.S. Army SBS program should a competition and award take place this year, achieving further progress in our U.S. government's frequency relocation program and demonstrating progress with other U.S. government customers such as the Coast Guard and DHS.

Second, continuing to grow our TMS business while increasing its contribution to funded backlog and continuing adoption momentum of Switchblade variants. Third, achieving the next major milestone in our CIS business plan this calendar year which includes shipment of initial Quantix drone and decision support system subscriptions to customers in agriculture. We're taking a gated approach that includes evaluating adoption to inform each subsequent phase of how we build this potentially large business.
Fourth, continuing to grow our EV charging business domestically and globally through relationships with automakers while maintaining our leadership in industrial EV charging and EV test systems. And fifth, successfully deploying our key fiscal 2018 strategic internal initiatives which include our people strategy and our business process improvement program to further position AeroVironment for long term growth and value creation.
Now I will share our view of fiscal 2018. As Teresa described moments ago, our total visibility for fiscal 2018 is now 41%, the same as this time last year. Given our visibility, the strong performance our team, our planning and forecasting based on customer demand signals, favorable macro factors and our strong position we expect revenue to grow to between $280 million and $300 million this year. We expect the mix of revenue, meaning the blend of higher margin product revenue and fixed priced contract versus lower margin services revenue in cost plus contracts to result in lower gross margin this year than last year.
We plan to spend between 9% and 10% of revenue on internal research and development investments in fiscal 2018 and we expect a significantly higher tax rate than last year. We anticipate the net impact of revenue, mix, spending and taxes will produce fully diluted earnings per share between $0.45 and $0.65. We expect lower seasonality in our results than last year with first half revenue representing about 40% of our full year. We anticipate revenue in our first quarter historically the lowest of each fiscal year of between $40 million and $44 million which fully diluted loss per share of between $0.32 and $0.40.
Before we move to Q&A, I would like to reemphasize the main point of today's call. First, our business remains strong and profitable and our team achieved or exceeded our financial objectives for fiscal 2017. Second, we achieved good progress on our fiscal 2017 milestones that maintained the leading market position in our core business and advanced our differentiated solutions for large and new global opportunities and our growth portfolio. And third, we remain on track for long term value creation.
I would also like to remind you that AeroVironment continues to maintain a strong position in the most exciting categories of the defense market, with profitable businesses and strong growth prospects. Our strategic growth opportunities such as our commercial businesses offered the ability to capitalize on additional multibillion dollar market opportunities. And our strong balance sheet gives us the important ability to move quickly to seize new markets when opportunities emerge.
Thank you to the AeroVironment team for your outstanding efforts in fiscal 2017 and for your relentless dedication to supporting our customers. Thank you to our customers who continue to make AeroVironment their preferred choice and thank you to our shareholders for your continued interest and confidence in us.
Now Teresa, Steve and I will take your questions.
Question-and-Answer Session
Operator
[Operator Instructions] Your first question comes from the line of Joseph De Nardi with Stifel. Your line is now open.
Joseph De Nardi
Wahid, I think you mentioned seeing some renewed interest in global Observer, I guess in the quarter, I'm wondering if you could just talk about that a little bit more in detail?

Wahid Nawabi
As we have said before AeroVironment remains to be a leader in that particular area of capability with a very strong demonstrated track record over two decades of successes and programs that we have executed on. And as we said from approximately three years ago that we have been engaged -- to my knowledge at least, engaged with various interested of customers both in the defense as well as the commercial markets for potential adoption and contracts for such capability. And we -- although the investment level is there fairly low, but we are still engaging and we continue to be engaged with customer -- of interested customers for that capability.
We've also said in the past and I repeat that, that represents a very large opportunity which remain so far to be essentially a zero for us in terms of capitalizing on that and making it to a real business. And however, should that odds change or that situation change, it does represent a very large opportunity for AeroVironment and AeroVironment offers a very compelling differentiated capability than anyone else in the world in that front.
And as we have more progress and engagements with the customers that are significant we will keep you abreast and informed.
Joseph De Nardi
Okay. But should I understand the comment that you made to suggest that you did see that in the quarter, you have seen some renewed interest there or no?
Wahid Nawabi
All I've said is that we continue to be enraged with various customers who have an interest in that capability. I have not said whether we have been engaged more or less than before, it's been an ongoing activity and effort for us a very small, very small insignificant investment, but still a small investment to pursue those opportunities that have a serious, what I call, qualify potential customers that could turn into an adoption eventually. But so far there is nothing new to report.
Operator
Thank you. Our next question comes from the line of Greg Konrad with Jefferies. Your line is now open.
Greg Konrad
I just wanted to touch on LMAMS, kind of where that program stands? If you look at the half mark [ph], they are obviously very supportive and you saw a nice mark-up there and maybe some of the milestones for that program or what type of feedback you are getting from the customer?
Wahid Nawabi
Yes, sure. So you are absolutely correct that the government budgeting process and the HAPC or HAP-C [ph] I think its referred to as had a favorable indicator for the procurement of those solutions and budgeting for that through the congressional budget approval process. Again, that remains to be just -- again it goes -- going through the process by itself right now, there is a specific line item on the Army's OCO or Overseas Contingency Operations line item for missile procurement of LMAMS and it's essentially, it's -- I believe it's line 14 on the actual budget line and it represents roughly $8.7 million worked up appropriation.
Now keep in mind that that does not mean that actual dollars are completely approved or funded, it's a request that has been made by the President's budget request or submittal and it has to go through the approval process as it always does. What I can tell you is that as you saw from our results in fiscal 2017 in the fourth quarter, we remain fairly enthusiastic and excited about the prospects of our tactical missile systems product portfolio. We are positioned very well because we have delivered very successfully in the past on multiple such opportunities, one of which that I mentioned earlier in the call in fiscal 2017.
The customer seems to really appreciate and prefer AeroVironment's capability and offering, and as I mentioned on my earlier remarks also the macro threat environment is such that I believe we are an exciting category of the defense as well as in a very exciting sub-category of UAVs or drones which is a Loitering Munitions, which Switchblade offers.

Steven Gitlin
And one thing to add Greg, this is Steve, is that LMAMS refers to a specific program for the Army that we're currently addressing with the product that we call Switchblade, which is the first, the initial, but only one of -- one element of our emerging family of tactical missile systems that are now addressing a broad range of customers opportunities and potential market value.
So progress on LMAMS, progress with our Switchblade product, but also as you can see from the results in the year on significant progress across the breath of our portfolio and tactical missile systems contributing to that 56% CAGR from 2011 and revenue associated with that part of our business.
Greg Konrad
Thank you and then just I wanted to touch on working capital. I think you mentioned in the script that there was some buildup of inventory to meet first half shipment, should we expect to see working capital come down as we kind of move through 2018 or is this kind of the appropriate level?
Teresa Covington
So Greg, this is Teresa, in my prepared remarks I talked that inventory, although down from the third quarter, ending the year at 60 million, was above the prior year. I mentioned that, yes, some of that is related to shipments that we expect in the first half of fiscal 2018. We do from time-to-time on a case-by-case basis, we will increase our inventory level to respond quickly to an international small UAS customer or a key domestic customer that we believe gives us ability to win business and has proven effective for us, but that's on a case-by-case basis.
Also, our accounts receivable, including our unbilled, it was up 13 million at the end of '17 versus '16, that is a result of just the high revenue in Q4, no change in terms of our DSO or collections.
Operator
Thank you, and our next question comes from the line of Peter Armand with Baird, your line is now open.
Peter Armand
Wahid, on the guidance for revenues the 280 million to 300 million, wondering if you could just clarify why the kind of expectation you have a lower margin mix? It seems like TMS is really ramping, international is really ramping, would seem that would be, that might potential have some additional favorable margins.
Wahid Nawabi
Peter, great question. As I mentioned on my remarks, so we do expect the gross margin percentage for the year fiscal '18 to be slightly lower than fiscal '17, and there's actually two factors related to -- three things or factors that make up the gross margin percentage and the product category. First one is, the different products, such as one version of the Raven versus a different version of the Raven have different profitability profiles.
So different product mix by itself, has a different profile. Number two is, variations between product sales and services sale. As you could see from our tactical missile systems business for example that we generated a significant amount of revenue from customer funded RMV programs or engineering services type programs or projects, and those tend to be slightly lower margin than just selling products as a product revenue.
And then third, the type of contracts that we actually engage with customers or we deliver products to or services to customers also have a different profile of probability for example, products that we sell at firm fixed price contracts tend to generally have slightly higher risk, but also a higher profit for the company primarily because we invest money to sell those -- to make those products and then we sell them as a fixed price contract.
On the other hand, cost plus contracts relatively speaking has a slightly lower gross margin and profitability profile due to the fact that has lower risk but also you know lower profiting profile. So based on those three main factors of types of mix that changes in the product we expect the gross margins in fiscal '18 to be lower and that usually changes every year to some degree or another, but that's what the profile looks like for fiscal '18 right now.

Peter Armand
Got it and just one follow-up, on TMS the growth has been exponential and 70 million I guess in revenue was I think the number you quoted for fiscal '17 at what point does this business start to acquire significantly more CapEx going forward?
Wahid Nawabi
Another great question Peter. So we have been obviously very enthusiastic and bullish on our tactical missile systems for a while, if you recall about three years ago one of our strategic growth initiatives where we communicated to our shareholders that we're going to invest incrementally above and beyond our historical levels was a tactical missile systems business. And while we could not share the specific details of how much and to what product, we were fairly confident that the investments were going to payoff dividend and they've done so as you could see from the results from the past few years. And fiscal '17 revenues were close to $75 million versus about $41 million or $40 million in fiscal '16.
So, that family of products -- and so in addition to that we now have multiple variants of the products as I said, for different customer needs and different mission profiles and different applications. And all that means we're pursuing a few potential programs of records as well, as I mentioned. So all of that means that when there is a program of record, or there's more customer demand for or buying signals for those products we will have to invest in ramping up manufacturing and building additional production capacity.
And part of the investments that we made in last fiscal year was actually to expand and upgrade that capability to build the world's best, what I call Tactical Missile Systems or Loitering Munitions manufacturing capability in the world. And so, we're on track with that and we'll make the investments as we see them judiciously and prudently.
Operator
Thank you. And our next question comes from the line of Troy Jensen with Piper Jaffray. Your line is now open.
Nick Johnson
Thanks for taking my call, it's actually Nick Johnson on for Troy. Congrats first of all on the strong quarter. I wanted to ask on the news of your contract with the Australian Defense Force and your comments on future expansion with international customers, would you guys expect these future contracts with the new countries be substantial in size similar to one with Australia. Additionally, do you further expect to expand your fleet with your current international customers?
Wahid Nawabi
So, Nick good afternoon and as you also saw from our previous -- my previous or earlier comments, the international small UAS category of our business has been very strong in the last few years and I've said this many times in the past which is the adoption cycle and phase which most of our international customers on aggregate are at is about five to 10 years behind our domestic U.S. DoD customer adoption curve.
And the number of countries I'm pleased to inform -- obviously announce that we've achieved over 40 countries, it's a very reputable list of countries around multiple continents and multiple geographies. So, that all bodes really well for the strength and the customers desire and pull for our solutions and our differentiated capabilities. Every country is somewhat different and unique in its profile of need as well as the adoption curve.
So specific to your question we have a mix of all. We have a mix of some customers that are fairly advanced in their adoption curve, such as the announcement with the Netherlands customers, we see the contracts that I mentioned in my call for multimillions of dollars and it was primarily an upgrade and extension of our line versus other customers that are just initiating initial buy or the Australian case where they had evaluated our products and now they are actually proceeding with a program of record for the Wasp AE family of systems.

So in general, we expect that to grow and continue to be strong throughout this year and in coming year and we are very delighted about our position and pleased with the results that we've achieved so far.
Operator
[Operator Instructions] And we have a follow up question from the line of Joseph De Nardi with Stifel. Your line is now open.
Joseph De Nardi
Wahid thanks for the additional color on TMS in terms of disclosing the revenue. If you look at UAS excluding the growth from TMS revenues were down there does that -- the remainder of the UAS business starts to stabilize in FY '18, is that your expectation?
Wahid Nawabi
Great question Joe and you welcome about the comment earlier. So here is how I view this in general Peter -- Joe. First and foremost, since our product portfolio has grown over the last few years significantly, we now have different customers and different markets and geographies and different applications with various degrees or different stages of their adoption in life cycle.
I would characterize the domestic small UAS customer base, the most what I call advanced or ahead of the adoption curve, where they are in a sustainment and upgrade mode, I referred to those terminologies internally, so I hope you can understand my rational behind that. And what I mean by that is that, we have a very large installed base, they are very comfortable with our products, they see the value in our products and primarily they are buying upgrades and sustainment spare parts and logistic services for the products.
In those cases, for example, the i45 which we announced and shift a significant number of them in fourth quarter was one example of that upgrade opportunity within our domestic U.S. customer base. In addition to that we are also launching new products and introducing products such as the example of the Snipe UAV that I mentioned that we delivered 30 systems in the fourth quarter and that’s geared towards the new program of potential program of record calls SBS of soldier board sensor program. And so that represents a new growth opportunity.
Additionally, we are pursuing new customers for existing and new products, and I mentioned in my -- on the call earlier that we are pursuing adoption and we made progress with the U.S. Navy and also their line items in the budget for department of homeland security or customs and border petrol as well as U.S. coast guards. These are customers that we have been pursuing and engaged with for a while and they are now starting to come online or do procurements and budget for these capabilities which I expect in the long run to pay fairly strong dividend for us in general.
So I don’t feel as it's down, I view that its going through a different cycle of its phase and it has growth opportunities within itself, but also upgraded new products sales to new and existing customers.
Joseph De Nardi
Okay, and then I guess just on TMS. Can you just talk about, to the extent you can, how big that business can get in terms of the way it seems deployed now, is it being used more broadly than you had expected, I mean, just any color on what you are expectations are for that family of products?
Wahid Nawabi
Sure. So Joe, a long time ago we decided to really provide specific guidance in terms of the exact size of these market except to refer to third party data. What we have shared in the tactical missile systems category, for example, specifically the original Switchblade, that the addressable market which Switchblades -- the original Switchblade can and does provide a more compelling value preposition that can replace or displace represents roughly about $1 billion worth of annual spend in the U.S. DoD budgets for line items alone.
And so again that's just a general rough estimate of the size of that potential market opportunity for the original Switchblade. And as I mentioned, we have more than one variant of our original Switchblade, one variant of which we've been able to disclose with you in more detail which was the Blackwing product. And that is a submarine launched UAV, non-lethal, that essentially gives the submarine visual line-of-sight beyond the periscope and it allows it to communicate multidomain platforms through to a ship, airplane, satellite and submarines and UUVs.

So that portfolio is growing, the customer interest in that product line is strong and fairly healthy and also our execution and our value preposition seems to be resonating with the customer base and very compelling and differentiatable.
Operator
Thank you. And our next question comes from the line of Martin Miller [ph], a private investor. Your line is now open.
Unidentified Analyst
I apologize in advance if this subject has been covered because I was disconnected for a short-time, as follows. In the last reporting period, I recall that we were told that the company was essentially debt free, I might not be using the phrase correctly, but I'm wondering if that has changed materially or? Thank you.
Wahid Nawabi
Thank you, Martin. This is Wahid. We have -- we're fairly in a good position in terms of our balance sheet. You are fairly accurate on your conclusion that the company doesn’t carry much debt. So we have lines of credits, but we don’t really don’t really carry much debt at all in our balance sheet. And we do have a strong cash position on the balance sheet, primarily the board looks at that on a very regular basis, we as a management team review that very regularly and there are many reasons as to why we have that position that we have based on our strategy and our business profile.
Unidentified Analyst 
Alright, thank you. And may I have the second question, again I apologize in advance if covered already. And I'm wondering if our team is addressing with the government regulators, the issues of altitude and distance on air traffic and the like, and are we making progress, are we being joined by other interested manufacturers? Thank you.
Wahid Nawabi
Sure Martin. This is Wahid again, so we enjoy a very good and positive working relationship with various regulatory agencies in the national airspace, primarily the FAA. We've had a relationship with FAA for a very long time and I characterize it as a very cooperative, productive and successful healthy relationship.
There are number of different activities that we're involved with and engage with FAA and the industry partners and the commercial rules and regulatory requirements around the use of drones and UAVs in the national airspace for commercial applications. There are multiple different projects and we'll be glad to share that with you in more detail later at a separate time if you like, but we are involved in that and we are aware of the fact that would play a significant role in the long run in terms of the adoption of UAVs for the commercial airspace.
One example that I shared on the -- on my comments earlier was, the demonstration that we made with Dominion Virginia Power and Virginia Tech with a strategic industry partner called Ligado, and what we did is we flew our Puma UAVs approximately 14 miles away from the site where it was launched, along power lines and we transferred communication and control of the UAV to a satellite and terrestrial system provided by the Legado Networks which essentially demonstrated the capability of operating beyond visual line of sight.
And that is a significant demonstration in my opinion in terms of demonstrating the ability that we can operate these UAVs safely and successfully well beyond the visual line of sight in the national airspace for commercial applications. And we did that earlier this summer, this year and I consider it as one example of such engagements that we have with the industry and various government agencies.
Steven Gitlin
And one note to add to that if I may, our products unlike many others in the -- who are entering the market, have been used for decades regularly around the world in some of the most inhospitable environments and beyond visual line of sight missions and application. So, we design our products to perform effectively, safely and reliably in a wide variety of applications including beyond visual line of sight and as Wahid mentioned we're actively engaged domestically and are eager to help lead the way into a future where safe effective and reliable beyond visual line of sight drone operations take place.

Operator
Thank you, and we have a follow up question from the line of Peter Armand with Baird. Your line is now open.
Peter Armand
Just a quick housekeeping one. You mentioned the higher tax rate for fiscal '18, Teresa is there any sort of expected range that you're looking at?
Teresa Covington
Yes Peter, I did not include and we didn't provide guidance on the range, we are expecting it to be higher. Historically, with higher pre-tax income AeroVironment's tax range has been in the 25% to 35% range.
Operator
Thank you, and I'm showing no further questions at this time, I would now like to turn the call back to Mr. Steven Gitlin for any closing remarks.
Steven Gitlin
Thank you, Chelsey, we do apologize for the technical issues that arose during the course of today's call, we're going to work diligently to determine what the cause of those are and ensure that those don’t happen again. We're also going to be working closely with the folks who developed the transcript for this call to ensure that it accurately reflects the comments that were delivered by both CEO, Wahid Nawabi and CFO, Teresa Covington today. So you can be sure that you're certain about the content we provided today.
Thank you for your attention and for your interest in AeroVironment. An archived version of this call, all SEC filings and relevant company and industry news can be found on our website at avinc.com, and we look forward to speaking with you and being heard by you without interruption again following next quarter’s results. Thank you very much.
Operator
Ladies and gentlemen, thank you for participating in today’s conference. This does conclude the program, and you may all disconnect. Everyone have a great day.
Copyright policy: All transcripts on this site are the copyright of Seeking Alpha. However, we view them as an important resource for bloggers and journalists, and are excited to contribute to the democratization of financial information on the Internet. (Until now investors have had to pay thousands of dollars in subscription fees for transcripts.) So our reproduction policy is as follows: You may quote up to 400 words of any transcript on the condition that you attribute the transcript to Seeking Alpha and either link to the original transcript or to www.SeekingAlpha.com. All other use is prohibited.
THE INFORMATION CONTAINED HERE IS A TEXTUAL REPRESENTATION OF THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S CONFERENCE CALL, CONFERENCE PRESENTATION OR OTHER AUDIO PRESENTATION, AND WHILE EFFORTS ARE MADE TO PROVIDE AN ACCURATE TRANSCRIPTION, THERE MAY BE MATERIAL ERRORS, OMISSIONS, OR INACCURACIES IN THE REPORTING OF THE SUBSTANCE OF THE AUDIO PRESENTATIONS. IN NO WAY DOES SEEKING ALPHA ASSUME ANY RESPONSIBILITY FOR ANY INVESTMENT OR OTHER DECISIONS MADE BASED UPON THE INFORMATION PROVIDED ON THIS WEB SITE OR IN ANY TRANSCRIPT. USERS ARE ADVISED TO REVIEW THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S AUDIO PRESENTATION ITSELF AND THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S SEC FILINGS BEFORE MAKING ANY INVESTMENT OR OTHER DECISIONS.
If you have any additional questions about our online transcripts, please contact us at: transcripts@seekingalpha.com. Thank you!
About this article:ExpandTagged: Industrial Goods, Aerospace/Defense Products & Services, TranscriptsError in this transcript? Let us know.Contact us to add your company to our coverage or use transcripts in your business.Learn more about Seeking Alpha transcripts here.Follow SA Transcripts and get email alertsSearch TranscriptThis transcriptFindAll transcriptsFindCompare To:All AVAV TranscriptsOther Companies in this sector





Manufacturing and Industrial Stocks | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»Manufacturing and Industrial Stocks3M: Still A Great Company After Q2 Earnings ReleaseMMM• Today, 4:05 AM • Ploutos InvestingPlug Power Surprisingly Increases Expensive Credit Facility With NY Green BankPLUG• Today, 12:24 AM • Henrik Alex•5 CommentsTower International, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesTOWR• Today, 12:03 AM • SA TranscriptsMcDermott International Is Still A BargainMDR• Yesterday, 5:28 PM • Orthodox Investor•5 CommentsIDEX Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesIEX• Yesterday, 4:59 PM • SA TranscriptsD. R. Horton Inc. 2017 Q3 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesDHI• Yesterday, 4:59 PM • SA TranscriptsThe Boeing Company 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesBA• Yesterday, 2:51 PM • SA Transcripts•1 CommentBoeing Is Hitting New All-Time HighsBA• Yesterday, 12:45 PM • Jonathan Weber•11 CommentsBoeing: This Amazes MeBA• Yesterday, 10:45 AM • Quad 7 Capital•20 CommentsUnited States Steel Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesX• Yesterday, 9:20 AM • SA Transcripts•1 CommentUSG Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesUSG• Yesterday, 9:19 AM • SA TranscriptsTimken Co. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesTKR• Yesterday, 9:19 AM • SA TranscriptsRockwell Automation, Inc. 2017 Q3 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesROK• Yesterday, 9:17 AM • SA TranscriptsIngersoll-Rand plc 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesIR• Yesterday, 9:16 AM • SA TranscriptsFLIR Systems, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesFLIR• Yesterday, 9:14 AM • SA Transcripts3M: Buy The Dip For Growth And IncomeMMM• Yesterday, 8:50 AM • Stefan Redlich•11 CommentsJoint French-German Fighter Jet Initiative May Affect Lockheed's F-35 Sales ProspectsLMT• Yesterday, 8:49 AM • Zoltan Ban•32 CommentsGEA Group AG 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesGEAGF• Yesterday, 8:02 AM • SA TranscriptsGKN Plc 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesGKNCF• Yesterday, 7:31 AM • SA TranscriptsIran And Its Love For Western AircraftBA, EADSF• Yesterday, 7:30 AM • Dhierin Bechai•5 CommentsI Was Wrong About CaterpillarCAT• Yesterday, 6:58 AM • Josh Arnold•12 CommentsLonza Group AG ADR 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesLZAGY• Yesterday, 2:27 AM • SA TranscriptsHoneywell Is Off To The Races AgainHON• Tue, Jul. 25, 4:13 PM • Josh Arnold•1 CommentIllinois Tool Works Finding It Harder To Clear A Rising BarITW• Tue, Jul. 25, 2:47 PM • Stephen Simpson, CFA•2 CommentsWestport Fuel Systems: Consensus EBIT Estimates Miss The MarkWPRT• Tue, Jul. 25, 2:22 PM • Eric R. I. Crawford•22 CommentsCrane Co. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesCR• Tue, Jul. 25, 1:04 PM • SA TranscriptsSnap-on: The Market Rightfully Discounts Current MarginsSNA• Tue, Jul. 25, 12:35 PM • The Value Investor•1 CommentAllegheny Technologies Incorporated 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesATI• Tue, Jul. 25, 11:40 AM • SA TranscriptsLincoln Electric Holdings, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesLECO• Tue, Jul. 25, 10:28 AM • SA TranscriptsMcDermott International, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesMDR• Tue, Jul. 25, 9:35 AM • SA TranscriptsPentair Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesPNR• Tue, Jul. 25, 9:16 AM • SA TranscriptsPulteGroup, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesPHM• Tue, Jul. 25, 9:15 AM • SA TranscriptsAltra Industrial Motion Corp. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesAIMC• Tue, Jul. 25, 9:15 AM • SA Transcripts3M Company 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesMMM• Tue, Jul. 25, 9:15 AM • SA Transcripts•13 CommentsCaterpillar Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesCAT• Tue, Jul. 25, 9:13 AM • SA Transcripts•1 CommentOutokumpu OYJ 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesOUTKF• Tue, Jul. 25, 8:02 AM • SA TranscriptsBoeing 787 Needs Aggressive Cost CuttingBA• Tue, Jul. 25, 7:00 AM • Dhierin Bechai•20 CommentsUPM-Kymmene Corp. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesUPMKF• Tue, Jul. 25, 6:24 AM • SA TranscriptsAkzo Nobel N.V. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesAKZOF• Tue, Jul. 25, 4:57 AM • SA TranscriptsStanley Black & Decker: Yet Another Classic Beat And Raise QuarterSWK• Tue, Jul. 25, 2:10 AM • Greg Wajda•3 CommentsALR's Stock Of The Week: Interface Inc.TILE• Mon, Jul. 24, 3:10 PM • Paul Price•4 CommentsAeroVironment: Post-Earnings Gains Get To (Or Past) Fair ValueAVAV• Mon, Jul. 24, 1:23 PM • Vince Martin•3 CommentsQuanta Services (PWR) Acquires Stronghold - M&A SlideshowPWR• Mon, Jul. 24, 1:23 PM • SA TranscriptsPlug Power (PLUG) expands relationship with Walmart - SlideshowPLUG• Mon, Jul. 24, 1:11 PM • SA Transcripts•3 CommentsIllinois Tool Works Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesITW• Mon, Jul. 24, 11:08 AM • SA TranscriptsArconic Inc 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesARNC• Mon, Jul. 24, 9:02 AM • SA TranscriptsStanley Black & Decker, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesSWK• Mon, Jul. 24, 8:42 AM • SA TranscriptsHandy & Harman Takeout Offer Is Too LowHNH• Mon, Jul. 24, 8:34 AM • Silky Oak Capital•21 CommentsDreamliner Balance To Improve FurtherBA• Mon, Jul. 24, 6:54 AM • Dhierin Bechai•19 CommentsPlug Power's Revised Wal-Mart Agreement Should Put Liquidity Issues To RestPLUG• Mon, Jul. 24, 5:40 AM • Henrik Alex•26 CommentsWaste Management Stock AnalysisWM• Sun, Jul. 23, 4:39 PM • Dividend Diplomats•11 CommentsJinko Solar Goes ParabolicJKS• Sat, Jul. 22, 10:56 AM • Shareholders Unite•24 CommentsWaste Management's Stock Looks OvervaluedWM• Sat, Jul. 22, 8:48 AM • Strubel Investment Management•19 CommentsNordson: A Premier Dividend King Dispensing Higher Dividends For 53 Straight YearsNDSN• Sat, Jul. 22, 7:10 AM • Simply Safe Dividends•11 CommentsResolute Mining - 300K Oz/Year Gold Producer Trading Near 52-Week LowsRMGGF• Sat, Jul. 22, 2:45 AM • FI Fighter•6 CommentsMobile Mini, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesMINI• Fri, Jul. 21, 7:01 PM • SA TranscriptsHoneywell: Sticky Results Prompt InquiryHON• Fri, Jul. 21, 3:26 PM • Quad 7 Capital•7 CommentsTennant: Boring Is BetterTNC• Fri, Jul. 21, 2:39 PM • Michael Boyd•1 CommentQuanta Services Acquires Stronghold Companies For Up To $550 MillionPWR• Fri, Jul. 21, 1:18 PM • Donovan JonesRockwell Collins: Pre-Earnings PlayCOL• Fri, Jul. 21, 11:34 AM • Sam Paul•5 CommentsMetso Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesMXTOF• Fri, Jul. 21, 9:28 AM • SA TranscriptsBoeing: Beat Or Miss?BA• Fri, Jul. 21, 7:30 AM • Dhierin Bechai•20 CommentsDover: An Impressive Earnings Release From This Dividend AristocratDOV• Fri, Jul. 21, 4:16 AM • Sure DividendFundamental Issues At Fortescue Metals Exposed By Native Title ClaimFSUMF• Fri, Jul. 21, 1:59 AM • Jesse DonovanWill USG Corporation Continue To Grow?USG• Thu, Jul. 20, 7:23 PM • Alexander Vester•8 CommentsAmerican Outdoor Brands Is A BuyAOBC• Thu, Jul. 20, 5:25 PM • Philomena Doyle•9 CommentsBass Metals (BSSMF) Presents At Noosa Mining Conference 2017 - SlideshowBSSMF• Thu, Jul. 20, 3:52 PM • SA Transcripts3M: Place Your BetsMMM• Thu, Jul. 20, 3:25 PM • Josh Arnold•21 CommentsInstalled Building Products: Expectations Seem Too HighIBP• Thu, Jul. 20, 2:25 PM • Michael BoydDover Corp 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesDOV• Thu, Jul. 20, 11:35 AM • SA TranscriptsValmont Industries, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesVMI• Thu, Jul. 20, 11:24 AM • SA TranscriptsLower Boeing 787 Profits: No ProblemBA• Thu, Jul. 20, 10:16 AM • Dhierin Bechai•5 CommentsScreening For Potential Spin-Offs: 3MMMM• Thu, Jul. 20, 9:40 AM • Eric Nickolaison•14 CommentsSnap-on, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesSNA• Thu, Jul. 20, 9:17 AM • SA TranscriptsSun Hydraulics: Finally Turned The CornerEditors' Pick • SNHY• Thu, Jul. 20, 8:46 AM • Michael Boyd123456...219Next Page





Earnings Call Transcripts | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO» 








Earnings Transcripts


  Sectors 


All
Most Popular

Basic Materials
Conglomerates
Consumer Goods
Financial
Healthcare
Industrial Goods
Services
Technology
Utilities










Tower International's (TOWR) CEO James Gouin on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


TOWR•
      Thu, Jul. 27,  2:59 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




XL Group (XL) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


XL•
      Thu, Jul. 27,  2:39 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




Calfrac Well's (CFWFF) CEO Fernando Aguilar on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


CFWFF•
      Thu, Jul. 27,  2:34 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




GlaxoSmithKline's (GSK) CEO Emma Walmsley on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


GSK•
      Thu, Jul. 27,  2:32 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




SK Telecom Co's (SKM) Management on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


SKM•
      Thu, Jul. 27,  2:02 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




Telefonica Brasil's (VIV) CEO Eduardo Navarro on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


VIV•
      Thu, Jul. 27,  1:22 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




ServiceNow (NOW) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


NOW•
      Thu, Jul. 27, 12:59 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




Hub Group (HUBG) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


HUBG•
      Thu, Jul. 27, 12:07 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




Merit Medical Systems' (MMSI) CEO Fred Lampropoulos on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


MMSI•
      Wed, Jul. 26, 11:50 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Legg Mason (LM) Q1 2018 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


LM•
      Wed, Jul. 26, 11:49 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Discover Financial Services (DFS) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


DFS•
      Wed, Jul. 26, 11:45 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Nutrisystem's (NTRI) CEO Dawn Zier on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


NTRI•
      Wed, Jul. 26, 11:45 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




LVMH Moët Hennessy Louis Vuitton's (LVMHF) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


LVMHF•
      Wed, Jul. 26, 11:43 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Knowles (KN) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


KN•
      Wed, Jul. 26, 11:41 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Edwards Lifesciences (EW) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


EW•
      Wed, Jul. 26, 11:37 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Tractor Supply (TSCO) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


TSCO•
      Wed, Jul. 26, 11:21 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Buffalo Wild Wings (BWLD) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


BWLD•
      Wed, Jul. 26, 11:19 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




LG Display's (LPL) on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


LPL•
      Wed, Jul. 26, 11:14 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




On Assignment (ASGN) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


ASGN•
      Wed, Jul. 26, 11:05 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Xilinx (XLNX) Q1 2018 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


XLNX•
      Wed, Jul. 26, 11:01 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




PayPal's (PYPL) CEO Dan Schulman on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


PYPL•
      Wed, Jul. 26, 10:57 PM

        •
SA Transcripts
•2 Comments 



IMAX (IMAX) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


IMAX•
      Wed, Jul. 26, 10:57 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Allegiant Travel (ALGT) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


ALGT•
      Wed, Jul. 26, 10:51 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Quidel Corporation's (QDEL) CEO Doug Bryant on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


QDEL•
      Wed, Jul. 26, 10:48 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Digimarc's (DMRC) CEO Bruce Davis on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


DMRC•
      Wed, Jul. 26, 10:47 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Transcat's (TRNS) CEO Lee Rudow on Q1 2018 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


TRNS•
      Wed, Jul. 26, 10:32 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Limelight Networks' (LLNW) CEO Bob Lento on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


LLNW•
      Wed, Jul. 26, 10:32 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Vertex Pharmaceuticals (VRTX) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


VRTX•
      Wed, Jul. 26, 10:29 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Lam Research (LRCX) Q4 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


LRCX•
      Wed, Jul. 26, 10:21 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Knight Transportation (KNX) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


KNX•
      Wed, Jul. 26, 10:19 PM

        •
SA Transcripts





123456...4442Next Page





Search Transcripts






You can use: AND,NOT, OR,* *(exact phrase)













 
AeroVironment's (AVAV) CEO Wahid Nawabi on Q3 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»AeroVironment's (AVAV) CEO Wahid Nawabi on Q3 2017 Results - Earnings Call TranscriptMar. 7.17 | About: AeroVironment, Inc. (AVAV) AeroVironment, Inc. (NASDAQ:AVAV)
Q3 2017 Earnings Conference Call
March 7, 2017 04:30 PM ET
Executives
Steve Gitlin – Vice President-Investor Relations
Wahid Nawabi – President and Chief Executive Officer
Teresa Covington – Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
Analysts
Ken Herbert – Canaccord
Joseph De Nardi – Stifel
Operator
Good day, ladies and gentlemen. Welcome to the AeroVironment Inc. Third Quarter Fiscal 2017 Earnings Call. At this time, all participants are in a listen-only mode. We will conduct a question-and-answer session after management’s remarks. As a reminder, this conference is being recorded for replay purposes.
With us today from the Company is the President and Chief Executive Officer, Mr. Wahid Nawabi; Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer (sic), Ms. Teresa Covington; and Vice President of Investor Relations, Mr. Steve Gitlin.
And now at this time, I would like to turn the conference over to Mr. Gitlin. Please go ahead, sir.
Steve Gitlin
Thank you, Liz, and welcome to today’s third quarter fiscal 2017 earnings call. Please note that on this call, certain information presented contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Forward-looking statements include without limitation, any statement that may predict, forecast, indicate or imply future results, performance or achievements, and may contain words such as believe, anticipate, expect, estimate, intend, project, plan, or words or phrases with similar meaning.
Forward-looking statements are based on current expectations, forecasts and assumptions that involve risks and uncertainties, including, but not limited to, economic, competitive, governmental and technological factors outside of our control, that may cause our business, strategy or actual results to differ materially from the forward-looking statements.
Factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from the forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, reliance on sales to the U.S. government; availability of U.S. government funding for defense procurement and R&D programs; changes in the timing and/or amount of government spending; risks related to our international business including compliance with export control laws, potential need for changes in our long-term strategy in response to future developments; the extensive regulatory requirements governing our contracts with the U.S. Government and international customers, the consequences to our financial position, business and reputation that could result from failing to comply with such regulatory requirements, unexpected technical and marketing difficulties inherent in major research and product development efforts; changes in the supply and/or demand and/or prices for our products and services; the activities of competitors and increased competition; failure of the markets in which we operate to grow; failure to remain a market innovator and create new market opportunities; changes in significant operating expenses, including components and raw materials; failure to develop new products; product liability, infringement and other claims; changes in the regulatory environment; and general economic and business conditions in the United States and elsewhere in the world.
For a further list and description of such risks and uncertainties, see the reports we file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The content of this conference call contains time sensitive information that is accurate only as of today, March 7, 2017. The Company undertakes no obligation to make any revision to the statements contained in our remarks or to update them to reflect the events or circumstances occurring after this conference call.

And just a process check here, Liz, if we resume a report that there is significant echo on the call that may be causing some problems for our listeners. So I’d appreciate if you could look into that and see if you can do anything about that.
And hopefully with that addressed, we will now begin with remarks from Wahid Nawabi. Wahid?
Wahid Nawabi
Thanks, Steve, and good afternoon. The three key messages today are; first, third quarter performance exceeded our expectations; second, high third quarter funded backlog of $128 million demonstrates continued strong customer demand for innovative solutions; and third, we anticipate growth this year and tactical missile systems and international small UAS and we’re excited about the availability of our commercial information solutions later this calendar year.
On today’s call, I’ll review our third quarter financial performance and then provide an update on the progress we’re making to achieve our fiscal 2017 objectives. Teresa Covington, AeroVironment CFO will then provide a detailed financial review before I discuss our outlook for the year and confidence in our long-term potential for value creation. Following our prepared remarks Teresa, Steve and I will take a questions.
Now a quick summary of third quarter financial performance, during the quarter we continue to execute our strategy successfully and achieve our objectives. Importantly continued strength and bookings an indicator of robust customer demand for innovative solutions produced our third highest scorer funded backlog ever of $128 million. This backlog combined with year-to-date revenue and bookings this quarter provides us with 94% visibility into the midpoint of our full year guidance, which Teresa will discuss in more detail shortly.
Third quarter revenue up $53.2 million was above the high end of the range I previewed last quarter and loss per share of $0.09 was significantly more favorable than our expectations. Two factors contributed to the loss. First, revenue was lower than our breakeven run rate. Second, similar to our first and second quarter this year plan increases and sustaining engineering reduced gross margins compared to levels from last year. The loss was smaller than we expected mainly due to higher than expected revenue, favorable revenue mix and lower spending.
Now let’s quickly review progress and the quarter again some of the milestones I identified at the beginning of this fiscal year. Our core business with the U.S. Department of Defense for Group 1 UAS remains strong with the largest unit share by far of the total unmanned aircraft fleet and a successful track record of winning more than 90% of the competitive task order dollars issued under the army’s latest small UAS program since exception in 2012.
We continue to provide new small UAS to customers to meet their stated requirements and deliver replacements when systems reach the end of their operational lives. And UAS we also deliver sustainment support through spare parts and provide options for our customers to upgrade their products in order to serve their needs better. Our i45 sensor suite significantly improve situational awareness through superior optical capabilities. The i45 is an upgrade to our Puma AE system that represents a healthy opportunity for us and reflects the value of continuous innovation to creating new capability for customers.
As a point of reference when we introduced the gimbal sensor upgrade several years ago, our U.S. DoD customers procured it to upgrade their existing Raven B fleets. We recently submitted our proposal to the army for the frequency relocation program, which requires that all small UAS be modified to operate on a new segment of the frequency spectrum. This spectrum ship is due to the fact that the federal government sold the frequency currently used by small UAS to commercial firms.

We will provide an update on this opportunity as we learn more. Indicative of new opportunities within the U.S. DoD, we expect to deliver 30 next generation Snipe Nano unmanned aircraft systems to a domestic customer for evaluation soon. The army Soldier Borne Sensors or SBS program calls for pocketable UAVs that frontline troops can quickly deploy to gain situational awareness within their immediate surroundings. We also continue to work with the U.S. Navy to pursue deployment of Puma AE systems on a larger number of their vessels.
Given our strong customer relationships and innovative solutions, we believe we are well-positioned to build on these opportunities to drive value for our stockholders. After a strong first generation small UAS procurement cycle from the early 2000s to early 2010, the U.S. DoD market has transitioned into a sustainment and upgrade phase for those systems while we continue to refine and advance new second generation capabilities. And contract the international market is in the initial stage of adoption for first generation small UAS. During our third quarter we continue to see strong international demand for a small UAS contributing to our robust funded backlog and representing a significant portion of our expected high fourth quarter revenue.
Turning back to the U.S. government market our Tactical Missile Systems business, which has grown into a significant contributor to our results remained a strategic long-term growth opportunity. We believe the market opportunity for Tactical Missile Systems represents more than $1 billion based on annual DoD expenditures for legacy weapon systems. We believe TMS family of systems offers the fundamentally superior in more cost effective solutions than the legacy systems employed today and which we expect to displays for an array of missions.
TMS remains focused on U.S. government customers and continues to grow the direct result of straight strategic investments we made and prior years that have – and will continue to benefit our results. Within TMS, we continue to produce Switchblade systems for dismounted infantry force protection and focus on improving this product for a pending army program a record for Lethal Miniature Aerial Missile Systems or LMAMS.
We continue to work with the U.S. Navy to position Blackwing, our submarine launched intelligence, surveillance and reconnaissance or ISR solution broad adoption through deployment, development and evaluation.
Of the four additional Switchblade variants, we have discussed previously one is in production and three are in various stages of development, testing and evaluation much of it with customer funding. We expect TMS revenue to grow significantly from fiscal 2016 and believe there are compelling opportunities for additional growth in the years ahead. Another area of strategic investment is our commercial information solutions business or CIS.
Based on third party market assessments, we see a global market valued in the billions of dollars for drone based commercial solutions. CIS offers three differentiated solutions to commercial customers. First, our unique Quantix drone enables our customers to automatically map and scan more than 400 acres in 45 minutes, using both color and multispectral sensors, all at the push of a button.
Second, our decision support system processes scanned imagery and automatically produces, descriptive analytics and historical comparisons. And third, our turnkey flight services, support customers who choose not to own or operate drones. Part of what differentiates our valuable offering is it ease of views, high degree of integration and its professional grade design.
For example, if the customer knows how to use the tablet device then they can operate our Quantix drone, which plant its own flight path based on a user defined mapping area, then launches, scans the area and lands itself right where it launched from.

Our AV DSS processes the data from Quantix and then performs a number of automated operations that include anomaly detection and canopy coverage analysis for growers. We continue to work with early adopter customers in agriculture, energy, utilities and transportation to test and validate our solution. And this process is generating strong interest as we prepare for production and delivery later this calendar year.
Moving to another opportunity area, we remain engaged with potential customers for our atmospheric satellite capabilities. We will inform you should we achieve meaningful results in our discussions. And our EES segment, which consist EV test system, EV solutions and industrial EV charging systems – quarterly revenue increased by more than 70% year-over-year.
We experienced strong demand for EV test systems from global automakers and battery manufacturers in North America and Asia. And our EV solutions product line, we began shipping our level 2 home chargers to meet larger than forecasted initial demand driven by the Chevy Bolt EV launched in an additional North America OEM program.
In January, we surpassed 45,000 level 2 chargers deployed. Our PosiCharge industrial charger shipments picked up with several deployments of our new ProCore line introduced earlier this year. We also benefited from continued demand for our ground support equipment, charging systems at several airports during the quarter.
Before turning to our financial results, I’d like to welcome Teresa Covington to her new position as Chief Financial Officer. Teresa most recently served as our Vice President of Finance responsible for EES finance and managing corporate planning and treasury functions. I’d also like to thank Raymond Cook for his service of our previous CFO and wish him well.
Now, Teresa will review third quarter and year-to-date financials. Teresa?
Teresa Covington
Thank you, Wahid, and good afternoon everyone. Before I’ll review of our third quarter financial results, I would like to take a moment to express my gratitude and excitement at serving our stakeholders as Chief Financial Officer. I have been with AeroVironment for six years and have developed a deep understanding of our UAS, and EES businesses, while also developing a profound appreciation for our incredible team. I look forward to meeting our stockholders and the analysts who cover us.
Now third quarter financial results. Revenue for Q3 was $53.2 million a decrease of $14.4 million or minus 21% from the third quarter of fiscal 2016 revenue of $67.6 million. The decrease in revenue resulted from a decrease in product sales of $16.6 million partially offset by an increase in contract services revenue of $2.2 million.
Looking at revenue by segments, UAS revenue was $41.9 million a decrease of $19.2 million or minus 31% from the third quarter of fiscal 2016 revenue of $61.1 million. The decrease was due to a decrease in product deliveries of $21.5 million, partially offset by an increase and service revenue of $2.1 million and increasing customer funded R&D work of $0.2 million.
EES revenue was $11.3 million an increase of $4.8 million or 74% from the third quarter of fiscal 2016 revenue of $6.5 million. This increase was primarily due to an increase in product deliveries of EV test systems and industrial EV charging systems.
Turning to gross margin, gross margin for the third quarter was $19.4 million or 36% as compared to $26.6 million or 39% for the third quarter of fiscal 2016. The decrease in gross margin was primarily due to decrease in product sales margin of $8.3 million, partially offset by an increase in service margins of $1 million.
By segment, UAS gross margin decreased to $16.4 million for the third quarter of fiscal 2017 from $24.6 million. As a percentage of revenue, gross margin for UAS decreased from 40% to 39%, primarily due to the increase in sustaining engineering costs in support of our existing products.

EES gross margin increased $1 million to $3 million for the third quarter of fiscal 2017, primarily due to the increase sales volume partially offset by the increase in sustaining engineering costs in support of our existing products.
SG&A expense for the third quarter of fiscal 2017 was $12.8 million or 24% of revenue, compared to SG&A expense of $13.3 million or 20% of revenue for the third quarter of fiscal 2016.
R&D expense for the third quarter of fiscal 2017 was $8 million or 15% of revenue, compared to R&D expense of $8.2 million or 12% of revenue for the third quarter of fiscal 2016. The operating loss for the third quarter was $1.4 million or minus 3% of revenue compared to operating income of $5.1 million or 7% of revenue for the third quarter of fiscal 2016.
The operating income decrease was primarily due to lower gross margins of $7.3 million, partially offset by a decrease in SG&A expense of $0.5 million and a decrease in R&D expense of $0.3 million.
Our effective income tax rate was minus 101.9% for the third quarter of fiscal 2017, this compared to an effective income tax rate of minus 22.5% for the third quarter of fiscal 2016. Our effective income tax rate for the third quarter of fiscal 2017 was impacted by change in estimate which reduced our full – estimated full year fiscal 2017 effective income tax rate.
The net loss for the third quarter of fiscal 2017 was $2.2 million or a $0.09 loss per share, compared to net income of $6.2 million or $0.27 earnings per share for the three months ended January 30, 2016.
Now moving through our first three quarter of fiscal 2017 results. Revenue for the first three quarters of fiscal 2017 was $139.5 million, a decrease of $39.8 million as compared to $179.3 million for the nine months ended January 30, 2016. The decrease in revenue was due to a decrease in product deliveries of $47.6 million, partially offset by an increase in contract service revenue of $7.8 million.
UAS revenue decreased $44.6 million to $113.2 million for the first three quarters of fiscal 2017, primarily due to a decrease in product deliveries of $52.8 million, partially offset by an increase in service revenue of $5.4 million and an increase in customer funded R&D work of $2.7 million.
EES revenue increased $4.8 million to $26.3 million for the first three quarter of fiscal 2017, primarily due to an increase in product delivery of EV test systems, EV solutions, and industrial EV charging systems.
Gross margin for the first three quarters of fiscal 2017 was $43.5 million as compared to $74.2 million for the first the first three quarters of fiscal 2016. The decrease was primarily due to a decrease in product margins of $32.2 million, partially offset by an increase in service margins of $1.5 million.
UAS gross margin decreased to $36.7 million for the first three quarters of fiscal 2017 from $66 million. As a percentage of revenue gross margin for UAS decreased from 42% to 32%, primarily due to the reversal for the settlement of prior year government incurred cost audit recorded in the second quarter of fiscal 2016, an increase in sustaining engineering cost and support of our existing products and an increase in warranty related cost.
EES gross margin decreased $0.8 million to $6.8 million for the first three quarters of fiscal 2017, primarily due to an increase in sustaining engineering costs in support of our existing products and the reserve reversal for the settlement of prior year government incurred cost audits recorded in the second quarter of fiscal 2016, partially offset by the increased sales volume.
SG&A expense for the first three quarters of fiscal 2017 with $39.8 million or 29% of revenue, compared to SG&A expense of $43.3 million or 24% of revenue for the first three quarters of fiscal 2016. SG&A expense decreased $3.5 million primarily due to a decrease in bid and proposal costs, a decrease in professional service, and a decrease in bonus expense.

R&D expense for the first three quarters of fiscal 2017 with $25.1 million or 18% of revenue, compared to R&D expense of $28 million or 16% of revenue for the first three quarters of fiscal 2016. The decrease in R&D expense was primarily due to a decrease in development activities for certain strategic initiatives. The operating loss for the first three quarters of fiscal 2017 with $21.1 million or minus 15% of revenue, compared to operating income of $2.9 million or 2% of revenue for the first three quarters of fiscal 2016.
The increase in operating loss was primarily due to lower gross margins of $30.7 million, partially offset by decrease in SG&A expense of $3.5 million and R&D expense of $2.9 million. The effective income tax benefit rate for the nine months ended January 28, 2017 was 30.5%, compared to the effective income tax benefit rate from the prior year of 361.2% for the nine months ended January 30, 2016.
The net loss for the first three quarters of fiscal 2017 with $18 million or $0.78 loss per share, compared to net income of $3.6 million or $0.16 earnings per share for the nine months ended January 30, 2016. Our funded backlog as of January 28, 2017 with $128.2 million, an increase of $48.5 million or 61% from the third quarter of fiscal year 2016, and an increase of $8.6 million or 7% from the second quarter of fiscal 2017.
Turning to our balance sheet, cash, cash equivalents and investments at the end of the third quarter of fiscal 2017 totaled $238.1 million, a decrease of $11.5 million from the prior quarter. The decrease in cash, cash equivalents and investments was driven by higher working capital requirements of the business. Accounts receivable including unbilled and retention receivables at the end of the third quarter of fiscal 2017 totaled $37.9 million, a decrease of $5.1 million from the prior quarter.
Total days sales outstanding was approximately 68 days, compared to 81 days at the end of the prior quarter. Net inventory at the end of the third quarter of fiscal 2017 was $68.8 million, compared to $55.2 million at the end of the prior quarter. Days and inventory were approximately 164 days compared to 137 days at the end of the prior quarter. This increase in days and inventory was primarily due to an increase in inventory for anticipated fourth quarter shipments.
Turning to capital expenditures, in the third quarter of fiscal 2017, we invested approximately $3.1 million or 6% of revenue in property improvements and capital equipment and recognized $1.8 million of depreciation and amortization expense.
Now an update to our fiscal 2017 visibility, as of today, we have year-to-date Q3 revenues of $139 million, Q3 ending backlog that we expect to execute in fiscal 2017 of an additional $107 million. Q4 quarter-to-date bookings that we anticipate to execute in fiscal 2017 of an additional $6.5 million. No unfunded backlog from incrementally funded contracts that we anticipate to recognize revenue during the balance of the year and no revenues needed to hold EES revenue flat relative to last year. This adds up to $252.6 million or 94% at the midpoint of our revenue guidance.
Now, I’d like to turn things back to Wahid to discuss AV’s expectations for the remainder of the year.
Wahid Nawabi
Thanks, Teresa. We continue execute our strategy building on leading positions and our core business and moving our growth portfolio toward the significant long-term market opportunities were pursuing. We remain the leading supplier of small UAS to the U.S. DoD. Our international small UAS business is thriving. TMS is growing. CIS is poised for launch and we see great progress in EES. We’re also very much aware of the variability and our short-term financial performance due to uncertainties associated with customer adoption.

As we have stated throughout this fiscal year, our results have been in line with our expectations. We’ve been preparing for our expected increase in revenue during the fourth quarter to achieve our full year outlook. We have been ordering long lead items in advance preparing documentation for export license request to the U.S. Department of State, building inventory and implementing additional efficiency enhancements across the organization.
Even with our planning and preparation as our international business and the number of customers were servicing has grown our exposure to delays associated with contracting, exporting, licensing and even travel visa approvals have increased. As we look to the balance of the fiscal year with this exposure in mind, we now expect full year financial results at the low end of our previously stated revenue and earnings per share guidance range of $260 million to $280 million and $0.20 to $0.35 respectively.
Once again our main messages today are, first, third quarter revenue – performance exceeded our expectations; second, high third quarter funded backlog of $128 million demonstrates continued strong customer demand for innovative solutions; and third, we anticipate growth this year in Tactical Missile Systems and international small UAS and we’re excited about the availability of our Commercial Information Solutions later this calendar year.
Thanks to our customers who placed their trust in AeroVironment to help them precede with certainty. Thanks to you, our stockholders who trust us to create long-term value. And thanks to our employees for their continuous efforts to deliver on our commitments.
Now Teresa, Steve and I will take your questions.
Question-and-Answer Session
Operator
[Operator Instructions] Your first question comes from the line of Ken Herbert with Canaccord.
Ken Herbert
Hi, Good afternoon.
Wahid Nawabi
Good afternoon, Ken.
Ken Herbert
Hi, Wahid. Hey, I just wanted to follow-up specifically on the international growth you’re seeing within the small unmanned aircraft or the small unmanned systems market. I mean clearly seems like that’s been a real source of upside over the last few quarters. Can you provide any commentary specifically around risks to this from a timing standpoint? Have you seen it sounds like most of this obviously is in your backlog, but are you seeing any concern past sort of the fourth quarter of 2017 into fiscal 2018 around sustainability of this growth and any change recently in sort of the attitude amongst your customers since the election in particular internationally.
Wahid Nawabi
Ken, that’s a great question. The question that we think about and discuss and analyze quite thoroughly internally. Overall, as you know, our international sales this year in the past year as well grown significantly. And we expect this growth to continue throughout fiscal 2017. Given and knowing that we have significant revenue and growth in this space, the size of these orders and contracts are large in nature and the number – I would refer to as a hurdles that we’ve to go through in order to secure a contract to get international travel schedules arranged get these approvals for some of our customers to come for demonstrations and factory acceptance tests, as well as securing export licenses from our U.S. Department of State. Always is a risk factor and continues to be a risk factor in terms of the timing of those orders being transformed into revenue.
And so for that matter, we do see those risks, as we’ve always seen and that has been the nature of our business. In regards to the prospects for the long-term we remain confident about our international small UAS business, I’ve said this in the previous earnings calls that our assessment is that the international markets for small UAS, is about 5 to 10 years behind the adoption curve of the U.S. domestic DoD market.

And so that means that we believe in the long run, we will see more adoption of our products and need for our products internationally. And we look forward to that. However, the timing of those orders always is a tough challenge to predict precisely.
Ken Herbert
Thanks Wahid. Just as a follow-up to that. Are you seeing as much demand internationally on the services side as you establish sort of a foothold with the products and does that something that you’ve seen much of the upside there yet or is that really upside that could be coming here in the future.
Wahid Nawabi
So, pretty much Ken on all of our international customers, we not only provide to our customers with a family of systems or systems solution, but also services related to training and enabling their force just to be able to operate these systems effectively. So they can get the actionable intelligence that they need – they deserve to precede with certainty, as well as support and logistics services such as spare parts and a sustainment, as well as repair activities that goes beyond just the initial acquisition of system solution and services.
And so usually, almost all of our international as well as domestic customers have a long life cycle with us beyond the initial procurement. And once we are into the sustainment mode we also get an opportunity to provide upgrades beyond just spare parts and sustainment.
Ken Herbert
Thank you very much I’ll stop there.
Wahid Nawabi
You’re welcome.
Operator
[Operator Instructions] Your next question comes from Joseph De Nardi with Stifel.
Joseph De Nardi
Yes, thank you very much. Wahid, I’m just wondering if you can talk a little bit about where we are kind on the this curve of reinvesting core earnings back into the business for some of the growth drivers. Is that kind of come to an end next year, I mean, you’re going to generate a decent amount of earnings in fourth quarter. So, I was think about what the run rate is for next year.
Wahid Nawabi
Joe, great question again, so our – as I mentioned in my remarks previously as well as today, our domestic U.S. DoD as you know, primarily with the U.S. Army we’re what I’d referred to as an sustainment mode. They have the number or the quantity of systems that our U.S. DoD customer believes primarily U.S. Army to maintain and meet the requirements that they had intended to achieve. And in the past several years as you know, we have been providing a significant amount of spare parts, repair activities and upgrades to our existing fleet.
So beyond that, we have opportunity to sell and deliver new solutions for new requirements of our existing customers and new customers. For example, the Snipe UAB that I just mentioned in this call and also the last call is a new requirement by the U.S. Army for Soldier Borne Sensor, which we believe were positioned extremely well and we’re going to be delivering 30 systems for demonstration in evaluation.
And beyond that we’ve been engage in the last year or two with U.S. Navy for the maritime application of our Puma AE system. So in the domestic market we continue to serve our domestic existing customers with sustainment and upgrade and we also continue to pursue new growth opportunities with new customers or existing customers or new products.
And last we also believe that while the lifecycle of the first generation of UABs with the U.S. domestic customers is going to sometime come to an end, it will – we believe that it will initiate the procurement of what we referred to as the second generation of our small UAS solutions to our U.S. domestic customers. And that will take a little bit of time, however, we do look forward to that and we are working towards that opportunity outcome.
Joseph De Nardi
Okay, and then maybe just on the balance sheet with the plan for the cash, I mean, maybe on the commercial or enterprise side of the business, do you see yourselves as acquirers in that market or is it too early really to do that.

Wahid Nawabi
We, Joe, believe that the commercial information solutions or the commercial application of drones and software analytics, represents a very large but also a long-term opportunity. And we’re very much as you said at the very, very early stages of getting the right solution to the market for us. We believe that our existing solutions that, that we have demonstrated, and unveiled is disruptive and has a unique and compelling value proposition that has received so far very strong positive customer feedback.
So we’re excited about launching that product and then we will be in a position to be able to test the market and then provide you with some updates as to what we expect in that market to happen. Related to the capabilities and acquisitions, we’ve always had the belief and the intent to fill the gaps of our capabilities when we find opportunities for acquisitions of filling that gap either in terms of a timeframe or cost, we could do it better and cheaper by acquisitions we will always do so.
So far we haven’t come across any that we believe and the board believes that is right for a decision, an execution and implementation. I also personally believe that there is quite significant investments going on in the space and the likelihood of properties becoming available at reasonable prices, probably will improve over time with any other industry. And when we find those opportunities we are – we will not hesitate to take action and deliver the result that we expect to our shareholders.
Joseph De Nardi
Thank you.
Operator
I’m showing no further questions in queue at this time. I’d like to turn the call back to Mr. Gitlin for any closing remarks.
Steve Gitlin
Thank you, Liz. Before we do close out, one question that typically comes up on the call for Teresa would be some indication of our expected CapEx this year and tax rate for the full year. Teresa, would you mind addressing that?
Teresa Covington
Sure. Regarding our capital spend our history at AeroVironment has been in the 2% to 5% of revenue range. Year-to-date, we’ve spent $7.6 million on capital, and I would expect our full year to be in 3% to 4% revenue range. Regarding our tax rate, we estimate our full year tax rate and we start with the statutory rate of our federal and state and then we have both a deduction for our federal R&D tax credit, and then we also mention that we had a reserve release in Q1 of 900,000. And so that would be our estimate of our full your tax rate is a combination of those factors.
Steve Gitlin
Great. So with that, we will close out and we thank you all for your attention today for your interest in AeroVironment. An archived version of this call, all SEC filings and relevant company and industry news can be found on our website, avinc.com. We look forward to speaking with you again following next quarter’s results. Good afternoon.
Operator
Ladies and gentlemen thank you for your participation in today’s conference. This concludes the program and you may now disconnect. Everyone have a great day.
Copyright policy: All transcripts on this site are the copyright of Seeking Alpha. However, we view them as an important resource for bloggers and journalists, and are excited to contribute to the democratization of financial information on the Internet. (Until now investors have had to pay thousands of dollars in subscription fees for transcripts.) So our reproduction policy is as follows: You may quote up to 400 words of any transcript on the condition that you attribute the transcript to Seeking Alpha and either link to the original transcript or to www.SeekingAlpha.com. All other use is prohibited.
THE INFORMATION CONTAINED HERE IS A TEXTUAL REPRESENTATION OF THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S CONFERENCE CALL, CONFERENCE PRESENTATION OR OTHER AUDIO PRESENTATION, AND WHILE EFFORTS ARE MADE TO PROVIDE AN ACCURATE TRANSCRIPTION, THERE MAY BE MATERIAL ERRORS, OMISSIONS, OR INACCURACIES IN THE REPORTING OF THE SUBSTANCE OF THE AUDIO PRESENTATIONS. IN NO WAY DOES SEEKING ALPHA ASSUME ANY RESPONSIBILITY FOR ANY INVESTMENT OR OTHER DECISIONS MADE BASED UPON THE INFORMATION PROVIDED ON THIS WEB SITE OR IN ANY TRANSCRIPT. USERS ARE ADVISED TO REVIEW THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S AUDIO PRESENTATION ITSELF AND THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S SEC FILINGS BEFORE MAKING ANY INVESTMENT OR OTHER DECISIONS.

If you have any additional questions about our online transcripts, please contact us at: transcripts@seekingalpha.com. Thank you!
About this article:ExpandTagged: Industrial Goods, Aerospace/Defense Products & Services, TranscriptsError in this transcript? Let us know.Contact us to add your company to our coverage or use transcripts in your business.Learn more about Seeking Alpha transcripts here.Follow SA Transcripts and get email alertsSearch TranscriptThis transcriptFindAll transcriptsFindCompare To:All AVAV TranscriptsOther Companies in this sector





Manufacturing and Industrial Stocks | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»Manufacturing and Industrial Stocks3M: Still A Great Company After Q2 Earnings ReleaseMMM• Today, 4:05 AM • Ploutos InvestingPlug Power Surprisingly Increases Expensive Credit Facility With NY Green BankPLUG• Today, 12:24 AM • Henrik Alex•5 CommentsTower International, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesTOWR• Today, 12:03 AM • SA TranscriptsMcDermott International Is Still A BargainMDR• Yesterday, 5:28 PM • Orthodox Investor•5 CommentsIDEX Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesIEX• Yesterday, 4:59 PM • SA TranscriptsD. R. Horton Inc. 2017 Q3 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesDHI• Yesterday, 4:59 PM • SA TranscriptsThe Boeing Company 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesBA• Yesterday, 2:51 PM • SA Transcripts•1 CommentBoeing Is Hitting New All-Time HighsBA• Yesterday, 12:45 PM • Jonathan Weber•11 CommentsBoeing: This Amazes MeBA• Yesterday, 10:45 AM • Quad 7 Capital•20 CommentsUnited States Steel Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesX• Yesterday, 9:20 AM • SA Transcripts•1 CommentUSG Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesUSG• Yesterday, 9:19 AM • SA TranscriptsTimken Co. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesTKR• Yesterday, 9:19 AM • SA TranscriptsRockwell Automation, Inc. 2017 Q3 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesROK• Yesterday, 9:17 AM • SA TranscriptsIngersoll-Rand plc 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesIR• Yesterday, 9:16 AM • SA TranscriptsFLIR Systems, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesFLIR• Yesterday, 9:14 AM • SA Transcripts3M: Buy The Dip For Growth And IncomeMMM• Yesterday, 8:50 AM • Stefan Redlich•11 CommentsJoint French-German Fighter Jet Initiative May Affect Lockheed's F-35 Sales ProspectsLMT• Yesterday, 8:49 AM • Zoltan Ban•32 CommentsGEA Group AG 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesGEAGF• Yesterday, 8:02 AM • SA TranscriptsGKN Plc 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesGKNCF• Yesterday, 7:31 AM • SA TranscriptsIran And Its Love For Western AircraftBA, EADSF• Yesterday, 7:30 AM • Dhierin Bechai•5 CommentsI Was Wrong About CaterpillarCAT• Yesterday, 6:58 AM • Josh Arnold•12 CommentsLonza Group AG ADR 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesLZAGY• Yesterday, 2:27 AM • SA TranscriptsHoneywell Is Off To The Races AgainHON• Tue, Jul. 25, 4:13 PM • Josh Arnold•1 CommentIllinois Tool Works Finding It Harder To Clear A Rising BarITW• Tue, Jul. 25, 2:47 PM • Stephen Simpson, CFA•2 CommentsWestport Fuel Systems: Consensus EBIT Estimates Miss The MarkWPRT• Tue, Jul. 25, 2:22 PM • Eric R. I. Crawford•22 CommentsCrane Co. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesCR• Tue, Jul. 25, 1:04 PM • SA TranscriptsSnap-on: The Market Rightfully Discounts Current MarginsSNA• Tue, Jul. 25, 12:35 PM • The Value Investor•1 CommentAllegheny Technologies Incorporated 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesATI• Tue, Jul. 25, 11:40 AM • SA TranscriptsLincoln Electric Holdings, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesLECO• Tue, Jul. 25, 10:28 AM • SA TranscriptsMcDermott International, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesMDR• Tue, Jul. 25, 9:35 AM • SA TranscriptsPentair Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesPNR• Tue, Jul. 25, 9:16 AM • SA TranscriptsPulteGroup, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesPHM• Tue, Jul. 25, 9:15 AM • SA TranscriptsAltra Industrial Motion Corp. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesAIMC• Tue, Jul. 25, 9:15 AM • SA Transcripts3M Company 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesMMM• Tue, Jul. 25, 9:15 AM • SA Transcripts•13 CommentsCaterpillar Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesCAT• Tue, Jul. 25, 9:13 AM • SA Transcripts•1 CommentOutokumpu OYJ 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesOUTKF• Tue, Jul. 25, 8:02 AM • SA TranscriptsBoeing 787 Needs Aggressive Cost CuttingBA• Tue, Jul. 25, 7:00 AM • Dhierin Bechai•20 CommentsUPM-Kymmene Corp. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesUPMKF• Tue, Jul. 25, 6:24 AM • SA TranscriptsAkzo Nobel N.V. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesAKZOF• Tue, Jul. 25, 4:57 AM • SA TranscriptsStanley Black & Decker: Yet Another Classic Beat And Raise QuarterSWK• Tue, Jul. 25, 2:10 AM • Greg Wajda•3 CommentsALR's Stock Of The Week: Interface Inc.TILE• Mon, Jul. 24, 3:10 PM • Paul Price•4 CommentsAeroVironment: Post-Earnings Gains Get To (Or Past) Fair ValueAVAV• Mon, Jul. 24, 1:23 PM • Vince Martin•3 CommentsQuanta Services (PWR) Acquires Stronghold - M&A SlideshowPWR• Mon, Jul. 24, 1:23 PM • SA TranscriptsPlug Power (PLUG) expands relationship with Walmart - SlideshowPLUG• Mon, Jul. 24, 1:11 PM • SA Transcripts•3 CommentsIllinois Tool Works Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesITW• Mon, Jul. 24, 11:08 AM • SA TranscriptsArconic Inc 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesARNC• Mon, Jul. 24, 9:02 AM • SA TranscriptsStanley Black & Decker, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesSWK• Mon, Jul. 24, 8:42 AM • SA TranscriptsHandy & Harman Takeout Offer Is Too LowHNH• Mon, Jul. 24, 8:34 AM • Silky Oak Capital•21 CommentsDreamliner Balance To Improve FurtherBA• Mon, Jul. 24, 6:54 AM • Dhierin Bechai•19 CommentsPlug Power's Revised Wal-Mart Agreement Should Put Liquidity Issues To RestPLUG• Mon, Jul. 24, 5:40 AM • Henrik Alex•26 CommentsWaste Management Stock AnalysisWM• Sun, Jul. 23, 4:39 PM • Dividend Diplomats•11 CommentsJinko Solar Goes ParabolicJKS• Sat, Jul. 22, 10:56 AM • Shareholders Unite•24 CommentsWaste Management's Stock Looks OvervaluedWM• Sat, Jul. 22, 8:48 AM • Strubel Investment Management•19 CommentsNordson: A Premier Dividend King Dispensing Higher Dividends For 53 Straight YearsNDSN• Sat, Jul. 22, 7:10 AM • Simply Safe Dividends•11 CommentsResolute Mining - 300K Oz/Year Gold Producer Trading Near 52-Week LowsRMGGF• Sat, Jul. 22, 2:45 AM • FI Fighter•6 CommentsMobile Mini, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesMINI• Fri, Jul. 21, 7:01 PM • SA TranscriptsHoneywell: Sticky Results Prompt InquiryHON• Fri, Jul. 21, 3:26 PM • Quad 7 Capital•7 CommentsTennant: Boring Is BetterTNC• Fri, Jul. 21, 2:39 PM • Michael Boyd•1 CommentQuanta Services Acquires Stronghold Companies For Up To $550 MillionPWR• Fri, Jul. 21, 1:18 PM • Donovan JonesRockwell Collins: Pre-Earnings PlayCOL• Fri, Jul. 21, 11:34 AM • Sam Paul•5 CommentsMetso Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesMXTOF• Fri, Jul. 21, 9:28 AM • SA TranscriptsBoeing: Beat Or Miss?BA• Fri, Jul. 21, 7:30 AM • Dhierin Bechai•20 CommentsDover: An Impressive Earnings Release From This Dividend AristocratDOV• Fri, Jul. 21, 4:16 AM • Sure DividendFundamental Issues At Fortescue Metals Exposed By Native Title ClaimFSUMF• Fri, Jul. 21, 1:59 AM • Jesse DonovanWill USG Corporation Continue To Grow?USG• Thu, Jul. 20, 7:23 PM • Alexander Vester•8 CommentsAmerican Outdoor Brands Is A BuyAOBC• Thu, Jul. 20, 5:25 PM • Philomena Doyle•9 CommentsBass Metals (BSSMF) Presents At Noosa Mining Conference 2017 - SlideshowBSSMF• Thu, Jul. 20, 3:52 PM • SA Transcripts3M: Place Your BetsMMM• Thu, Jul. 20, 3:25 PM • Josh Arnold•21 CommentsInstalled Building Products: Expectations Seem Too HighIBP• Thu, Jul. 20, 2:25 PM • Michael BoydDover Corp 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesDOV• Thu, Jul. 20, 11:35 AM • SA TranscriptsValmont Industries, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesVMI• Thu, Jul. 20, 11:24 AM • SA TranscriptsLower Boeing 787 Profits: No ProblemBA• Thu, Jul. 20, 10:16 AM • Dhierin Bechai•5 CommentsScreening For Potential Spin-Offs: 3MMMM• Thu, Jul. 20, 9:40 AM • Eric Nickolaison•14 CommentsSnap-on, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesSNA• Thu, Jul. 20, 9:17 AM • SA TranscriptsSun Hydraulics: Finally Turned The CornerEditors' Pick • SNHY• Thu, Jul. 20, 8:46 AM • Michael Boyd123456...219Next Page





Earnings Call Transcripts | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO» 








Earnings Transcripts


  Sectors 


All
Most Popular

Basic Materials
Conglomerates
Consumer Goods
Financial
Healthcare
Industrial Goods
Services
Technology
Utilities










Tower International's (TOWR) CEO James Gouin on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


TOWR•
      Thu, Jul. 27,  2:59 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




XL Group (XL) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


XL•
      Thu, Jul. 27,  2:39 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




Calfrac Well's (CFWFF) CEO Fernando Aguilar on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


CFWFF•
      Thu, Jul. 27,  2:34 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




GlaxoSmithKline's (GSK) CEO Emma Walmsley on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


GSK•
      Thu, Jul. 27,  2:32 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




SK Telecom Co's (SKM) Management on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


SKM•
      Thu, Jul. 27,  2:02 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




Telefonica Brasil's (VIV) CEO Eduardo Navarro on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


VIV•
      Thu, Jul. 27,  1:22 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




ServiceNow (NOW) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


NOW•
      Thu, Jul. 27, 12:59 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




Hub Group (HUBG) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


HUBG•
      Thu, Jul. 27, 12:07 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




Merit Medical Systems' (MMSI) CEO Fred Lampropoulos on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


MMSI•
      Wed, Jul. 26, 11:50 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Legg Mason (LM) Q1 2018 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


LM•
      Wed, Jul. 26, 11:49 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Discover Financial Services (DFS) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


DFS•
      Wed, Jul. 26, 11:45 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Nutrisystem's (NTRI) CEO Dawn Zier on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


NTRI•
      Wed, Jul. 26, 11:45 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




LVMH Moët Hennessy Louis Vuitton's (LVMHF) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


LVMHF•
      Wed, Jul. 26, 11:43 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Knowles (KN) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


KN•
      Wed, Jul. 26, 11:41 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Edwards Lifesciences (EW) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


EW•
      Wed, Jul. 26, 11:37 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Tractor Supply (TSCO) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


TSCO•
      Wed, Jul. 26, 11:21 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Buffalo Wild Wings (BWLD) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


BWLD•
      Wed, Jul. 26, 11:19 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




LG Display's (LPL) on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


LPL•
      Wed, Jul. 26, 11:14 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




On Assignment (ASGN) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


ASGN•
      Wed, Jul. 26, 11:05 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Xilinx (XLNX) Q1 2018 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


XLNX•
      Wed, Jul. 26, 11:01 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




PayPal's (PYPL) CEO Dan Schulman on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


PYPL•
      Wed, Jul. 26, 10:57 PM

        •
SA Transcripts
•2 Comments 



IMAX (IMAX) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


IMAX•
      Wed, Jul. 26, 10:57 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Allegiant Travel (ALGT) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


ALGT•
      Wed, Jul. 26, 10:51 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Quidel Corporation's (QDEL) CEO Doug Bryant on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


QDEL•
      Wed, Jul. 26, 10:48 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Digimarc's (DMRC) CEO Bruce Davis on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


DMRC•
      Wed, Jul. 26, 10:47 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Transcat's (TRNS) CEO Lee Rudow on Q1 2018 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


TRNS•
      Wed, Jul. 26, 10:32 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Limelight Networks' (LLNW) CEO Bob Lento on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


LLNW•
      Wed, Jul. 26, 10:32 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Vertex Pharmaceuticals (VRTX) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


VRTX•
      Wed, Jul. 26, 10:29 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Lam Research (LRCX) Q4 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


LRCX•
      Wed, Jul. 26, 10:21 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Knight Transportation (KNX) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


KNX•
      Wed, Jul. 26, 10:19 PM

        •
SA Transcripts





123456...4442Next Page





Search Transcripts






You can use: AND,NOT, OR,* *(exact phrase)













 



AeroVironment Chief Operating Officer Wahid Nawabi Named President (NASDAQ:AVAV)
























 






Jan 15, 2016



 Previous Release | Next Release 


PDF

Add to Briefcase
File is in Briefcase



AeroVironment Chief Operating Officer Wahid Nawabi Named President

 SIMI VALLEY, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--

      AeroVironment,

      Inc. (NASDAQ:AVAV) today announced Wahid Nawabi has been

      named president in addition to his role as chief operating officer,

      effective immediately. Tim Conver will continue as chairman and chief

      executive officer of AeroVironment.

    


      "Wahid's effective leadership as chief operating officer has contributed

      to significant improvements in our focus and operational effectiveness,"

      said Mr. Conver. "As president and chief operating officer, Wahid will

      continue to focus on executing our operating plan while taking on a

      larger role in our strategic planning process to drive continued value

      creation. I look forward to working closely with Wahid to continue

      building on our operational and financial momentum."

    


      "It is an honor to be named president of AeroVironment," said Mr.

      Nawabi. "I am excited to take on the role and continue working with Tim

      and the rest of the management team as we pursue innovative growth

      opportunities to deliver compelling value for our customers and

      stockholders."

    

Wahid Nawabi, 46, has served as chief operating officer of the Company

      since April 2015. He joined AeroVironment in 2011 as senior vice

      president and general manager of the EES business segment, where he led

      the redesign of the segment's business strategy and successfully

      launched a number of innovative new products. Mr. Nawabi also led

      multiple business process improvement projects, which led to significant

      enhancements in operational efficiency. He then led the integration of

      functional organizations into a single corporate shared services model

      across both UAS and EES business segments and all product lines. Before

      joining AeroVironment, Nawabi worked with global technology companies in

      industries spanning industrial/electrical equipment manufacturing and

      clean technology. Nawabi initiated and led the Enterprise/Data Center

      business at APC, which was later acquired by Schneider Electric, growing

      revenue to $600 million between 2000 and 2008. Nawabi also previously

      led C&D Technologies' Americas business.

    

About AeroVironment, Inc.



      AeroVironment is a technology solutions provider that designs, develops,

      produces, supports and operates an advanced portfolio of Unmanned

      Aircraft Systems (UAS) and electric transportation solutions. The

      company's electric-powered, hand-launched unmanned aircraft systems

      generate and process data to deliver powerful insight, on demand, to

      people and enterprises engaged in military, public safety and commercial

      activities around the world. AeroVironment's electric transportation

      solutions include a comprehensive suite of electric

      vehicle (EV) charging systems, installation and network services for

      consumers, automakers, utilities and government agencies, power

      cycling and test systems for EV developers and industrial

      electric vehicle charging systems for commercial fleets. More

      information about AeroVironment is available at www.avinc.com.

    

Safe Harbor Statement



      Certain statements in this press release may constitute "forward-looking

      statements" as that term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation

      Reform Act of 1995. These statements are made on the basis of current

      expectations, forecasts and assumptions that involve risks and

      uncertainties, including, but not limited to, economic, competitive,

      governmental and technological factors outside of our control, that may

      cause our business, strategy or actual results to differ materially from

      those expressed or implied. Factors that could cause actual results to

      differ materially from the forward-looking statements include, but are

      not limited to, our ability to perform under existing contracts and

      obtain additional contracts; our reliance on sales to the U.S.

      government; changes in the timing and/or amount of government spending;

      changes in the supply and/or demand and/or prices for our products and

      services; changes in the regulatory environment; the activities of

      competitors; failure of the markets in which we operate to grow; failure

      to expand into new markets; failure to develop new products or integrate

      new technology with current products; and general economic and business

      conditions in the United States and elsewhere in the world. For a

      further list and description of such risks and uncertainties, see the

      reports we file with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including

      our most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K and Quarterly Reports on

      10-Q. We do not intend, and undertake no obligation, to update any

      forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information,

      future events or otherwise.

    


      For additional media and information, please follow us at:

    


      Facebook: http://www.facebook.com/#!/pages/AeroVironment-Inc/91762492182Twitter:

      http://www.twitter.com/aerovironmentYouTube:

      http://www.youtube.com/user/AeroVironmentIncGoogle+:

      https://plus.google.com/100557642515390130818/posts

View source version on businesswire.com: http://www.businesswire.com/news/home/20160115005846/en/

AeroVironment, Inc.Steven Gitlin+1 (626) 357-9983ir@avinc.com

Source: AeroVironment, Inc.

News Provided by Acquire Media








 

AeroVironment Chief Operating Officer Wahid Nawabi Named President - MFRTech




























































   









Home
Section









Featured
Latest News
Technology Trends




Manufacturing
Public Policy/Government





Your Business

New Products




Trade Shows

Videos









Submit News
Subscribe
Contact














Home
 Home
AeroVironment Chief Operating Officer Wahid Nawabi Named President



Thursday, July 27, 2017







AeroVironment Chief Operating Officer Wahid Nawabi Named President



2016-01-15 22:58:48









SIMI VALLEY, Calif.--AeroVironment, Inc. (NASDAQ:AVAV) today announced Wahid Nawabi has been named president in addition to his role as chief operating officer, effective immediately. Tim Conver will continue as chairman and chief executive officer of AeroVironment.


“Wahid’s effective leadership as chief operating officer has contributed to significant improvements in our focus and operational effectiveness,” said Mr. Conver. “As president and chief operating officer, Wahid will continue to focus on executing our operating plan while taking on a larger role in our strategic planning process to drive continued value creation. I look forward to working closely with Wahid to continue building on our operational and financial momentum.”
“It is an honor to be named president of AeroVironment,” said Mr. Nawabi. “I am excited to take on the role and continue working with Tim and the rest of the management team as we pursue innovative growth opportunities to deliver compelling value for our customers and stockholders.”
Wahid Nawabi, 46, has served as chief operating officer of the Company since April 2015. He joined AeroVironment in 2011 as senior vice president and general manager of the EES business segment, where he led the redesign of the segment’s business strategy and successfully launched a number of innovative new products. Mr. Nawabi also led multiple business process improvement projects, which led to significant enhancements in operational efficiency. He then led the integration of functional organizations into a single corporate shared services model across both UAS and EES business segments and all product lines. Before joining AeroVironment, Nawabi worked with global technology companies in industries spanning industrial/electrical equipment manufacturing and clean technology. Nawabi initiated and led the Enterprise/Data Center business at APC, which was later acquired by Schneider Electric, growing revenue to $600 million between 2000 and 2008. Nawabi also previously led C&D Technologies' Americas business.
About AeroVironment, Inc.
AeroVironment is a technology solutions provider that designs, develops, produces, supports and operates an advanced portfolio of Unmanned Aircraft Systems (UAS) and electric transportation solutions. The company's electric-powered, hand-launched unmanned aircraft systems generate and process data to deliver powerful insight, on demand, to people and enterprises engaged in military, public safety and commercial activities around the world. AeroVironment's electric transportation solutions include a comprehensive suite of electric vehicle (EV) charging systems, installation and network services for consumers, automakers, utilities and government agencies, power cycling and test systems for EV developers and industrial electric vehicle charging systems for commercial fleets. More information about AeroVironment is available at www.avinc.com.
Safe Harbor Statement
Certain statements in this press release may constitute "forward-looking statements" as that term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements are made on the basis of current expectations, forecasts and assumptions that involve risks and uncertainties, including, but not limited to, economic, competitive, governmental and technological factors outside of our control, that may cause our business, strategy or actual results to differ materially from those expressed or implied. Factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from the forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, our ability to perform under existing contracts and obtain additional contracts; our reliance on sales to the U.S. government; changes in the timing and/or amount of government spending; changes in the supply and/or demand and/or prices for our products and services; changes in the regulatory environment; the activities of competitors; failure of the markets in which we operate to grow; failure to expand into new markets; failure to develop new products or integrate new technology with current products; and general economic and business conditions in the United States and elsewhere in the world. For a further list and description of such risks and uncertainties, see the reports we file with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including our most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K and Quarterly Reports on 10-Q. We do not intend, and undertake no obligation, to update any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.
For additional media and information, please follow us at:
Facebook: http://www.facebook.com/#!/pages/AeroVironment-Inc/91762492182
Twitter: http://www.twitter.com/aerovironment
YouTube: http://www.youtube.com/user/AeroVironmentInc
Google+: https://plus.google.com/100557642515390130818/posts 












 





















Updated daily, mfrtech.com includes featured articles and manufacturing news, product releases, business expansions, acquisitions and business forecasts submitted by our visitors or authored by editorial staff.

Advertise With Us







Contact Us
Phone: 844-295-TECH (844-295-8324)
Email: sales@mfrtech.com
1890 Starshoot Parkway 170-316
                                Lexington KY 40509
Join with Us














© Copyright 2017 by MFRTech



Home
Sitemap
Submit News
Subscribe
Contact
Client Login































Wahid Nawabi 的个人主页 | Facebook


Facebook邮箱或手机号密码忘记帐户？中文(简体)English (US)日本語한국어Français (France)Bahasa IndonesiaPolskiEspañolPortuguês (Brasil)DeutschItalianoMessengerFacebook Lite用户地点游戏位置名人二手市场小组食谱彩色气球Instagram公司简介创建广告创建主页开发者招聘信息隐私权政策Cookie广告选项条款设置活动日志 Facebook © 2017


















 



AeroVironment Chief Operating Officer Wahid Nawabi Named President | Business Wire


























































AeroVironment Chief Operating Officer Wahid Nawabi Named President






January 15, 2016 04:30 PM Eastern Standard Time



SIMI VALLEY, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--AeroVironment, 
      Inc. (NASDAQ:AVAV) today announced Wahid Nawabi has been 
      named president in addition to his role as chief operating officer, 
      effective immediately. Tim Conver will continue as chairman and chief 
      executive officer of AeroVironment.
    


      “Wahid’s effective leadership as chief operating officer has contributed 
      to significant improvements in our focus and operational effectiveness,” 
      said Mr. Conver. “As president and chief operating officer, Wahid will 
      continue to focus on executing our operating plan while taking on a 
      larger role in our strategic planning process to drive continued value 
      creation. I look forward to working closely with Wahid to continue 
      building on our operational and financial momentum.”
    

      “It is an honor to be named president of AeroVironment,” said Mr. 
      Nawabi. “I am excited to take on the role and continue working with Tim 
      and the rest of the management team as we pursue innovative growth 
      opportunities to deliver compelling value for our customers and 
      stockholders.”
    

      Wahid Nawabi, 46, has served as chief operating officer of the Company 
      since April 2015. He joined AeroVironment in 2011 as senior vice 
      president and general manager of the EES business segment, where he led 
      the redesign of the segment’s business strategy and successfully 
      launched a number of innovative new products. Mr. Nawabi also led 
      multiple business process improvement projects, which led to significant 
      enhancements in operational efficiency. He then led the integration of 
      functional organizations into a single corporate shared services model 
      across both UAS and EES business segments and all product lines. Before 
      joining AeroVironment, Nawabi worked with global technology companies in 
      industries spanning industrial/electrical equipment manufacturing and 
      clean technology. Nawabi initiated and led the Enterprise/Data Center 
      business at APC, which was later acquired by Schneider Electric, growing 
      revenue to $600 million between 2000 and 2008. Nawabi also previously 
      led C&D Technologies' Americas business.
    

About AeroVironment, Inc.


      AeroVironment is a technology solutions provider that designs, develops, 
      produces, supports and operates an advanced portfolio of Unmanned 
      Aircraft Systems (UAS) and electric transportation solutions. The 
      company's electric-powered, hand-launched unmanned aircraft systems 
      generate and process data to deliver powerful insight, on demand, to 
      people and enterprises engaged in military, public safety and commercial 
      activities around the world. AeroVironment's electric transportation 
      solutions include a comprehensive suite of electric 
      vehicle (EV) charging systems, installation and network services for 
      consumers, automakers, utilities and government agencies, power 
      cycling and test systems for EV developers and industrial 
      electric vehicle charging systems for commercial fleets. More 
      information about AeroVironment is available at www.avinc.com.
    

Safe Harbor Statement


      Certain statements in this press release may constitute "forward-looking 
      statements" as that term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation 
      Reform Act of 1995. These statements are made on the basis of current 
      expectations, forecasts and assumptions that involve risks and 
      uncertainties, including, but not limited to, economic, competitive, 
      governmental and technological factors outside of our control, that may 
      cause our business, strategy or actual results to differ materially from 
      those expressed or implied. Factors that could cause actual results to 
      differ materially from the forward-looking statements include, but are 
      not limited to, our ability to perform under existing contracts and 
      obtain additional contracts; our reliance on sales to the U.S. 
      government; changes in the timing and/or amount of government spending; 
      changes in the supply and/or demand and/or prices for our products and 
      services; changes in the regulatory environment; the activities of 
      competitors; failure of the markets in which we operate to grow; failure 
      to expand into new markets; failure to develop new products or integrate 
      new technology with current products; and general economic and business 
      conditions in the United States and elsewhere in the world. For a 
      further list and description of such risks and uncertainties, see the 
      reports we file with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including 
      our most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K and Quarterly Reports on 
      10-Q. We do not intend, and undertake no obligation, to update any 
      forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, 
      future events or otherwise.
    

      For additional media and information, please follow us at:
    

      Facebook: http://www.facebook.com/#!/pages/AeroVironment-Inc/91762492182Twitter: 
      http://www.twitter.com/aerovironmentYouTube: 
      http://www.youtube.com/user/AeroVironmentIncGoogle+: 
      https://plus.google.com/100557642515390130818/posts



Contacts

      AeroVironment, Inc.Steven Gitlin+1 (626) 357-9983ir@avinc.com









Release Summary
AVAV - AeroVironment, Inc. has named Wahid Nawabi as president in addition to his role as COO.






Contacts

      AeroVironment, Inc.Steven Gitlin+1 (626) 357-9983ir@avinc.com







 
 

 






Search




Advanced News Search

Advanced News Search













Log In
Sign Up















AeroVironment Announces Leadership Transition Plan (NASDAQ:AVAV)
























 






Apr 4, 2016



 Previous Release | Next Release 


PDF

Add to Briefcase
File is in Briefcase



AeroVironment Announces Leadership Transition Plan


Wahid Nawabi to Become Chief Executive Officer, Effective May 2, 2016


Tim Conver Announces Retirement as CEO, Effective May 1; Will

      Continue to Serve as Chairman of the Board of Directors

 SIMI VALLEY, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--

      AeroVironment, Inc. (NASDAQ: AVAV) today announced that its Board of

      Directors has appointed Wahid Nawabi, currently president and chief

      operating officer, as chief executive officer and a member of the Board

      of Directors, effective May 2, 2016. Mr. Nawabi succeeds Tim Conver, who

      will retire as CEO effective May 1, 2016, and remain chairman of the

      Board.

    


      "The AeroVironment Board, with my full support, has selected an

      outstanding and proven leader at a time when our management team is

      strong and our opportunities are great. This is the right time for Wahid

      Nawabi to transition to CEO of AeroVironment," said Mr. Conver.

      "Throughout his tenure at AeroVironment, Wahid has demonstrated

      exceptional leadership in complex and broad management roles while

      executing our strategy and generating value for our customers. Over the

      past five years, Wahid has been integral in supporting and building on

      our culture of innovation. He is uniquely capable and positioned to lead

      the next phase of AeroVironment's growth for the benefit of our

      customers, employees and stockholders. I look forward to working with

      Wahid and my fellow directors to continue supporting AeroVironment as

      chairman, with a focus on increasing long term stockholder value."

    


      "Tim recognized the unique potential of our people and culture more than

      25 years ago and transformed AeroVironment into a pioneering business

      and market leader, delivering valuable new categories of capability to

      customers in multiple industries," said Mr. Nawabi. "Today,

      AeroVironment operates a strong core business while advancing a

      portfolio of growth opportunities, including unmanned aircraft systems,

      Tactical Missile Systems, commercial UAS and electric vehicle charging.

      I am grateful for Tim and the Board's confidence in me, and honored to

      assume the leadership of our tremendous team in pursuit of continued

      growth and value creation."

    

Mr. Conver became AeroVironment's president in 1990 and has served as

      its CEO since 1992. During that period AeroVironment grew from a private

      company with annual revenue of $10 million to a public company with

      annual revenue last fiscal year of $259 million and a current market

      capitalization of more than $650 million.

    


      "The Board maintains an ongoing, deliberate process for managing

      executive succession. This announcement is the result of that process,

      and began when Tim first approached the Board to discuss planning for

      his succession several years ago," said Arnie Fishman, lead independent

      director. "When the Board appointed Wahid to the COO role nearly one

      year ago and to the role of president this past January, we were

      confident he was the right leader for AeroVironment. Wahid has

      demonstrated the skills and characteristics we knew were required to

      continue to lead the company with the success that Tim has delivered

      over the last 25 years and we are excited to welcome him to the new

      role."

    

About Wahid Nawabi


Wahid Nawabi, 46, has served as chief operating officer of AeroVironment

      since April 2015 and as president since January 2016. He joined the

      Company in 2011 as senior vice president and general manager of the EES

      business segment, where he led the redesign of the segment's business

      strategy and successfully launched a number of innovative new products.

      Mr. Nawabi also managed multiple business process improvement projects,

      which led to significant enhancements in operational efficiency. He then

      directed the integration of engineering, operations, supply chain and

      quality functional organizations into a single corporate shared services

      model across both UAS and EES business segments and all product lines.

      Before joining AeroVironment, Mr. Nawabi worked with global technology

      companies in industries spanning industrial/electrical equipment

      manufacturing and clean technology. He initiated and led the

      Enterprise/Data Center business at APC, which was later acquired by

      Schneider Electric, growing revenue to $600 million between 2000 and

      2008. Mr. Nawabi also previously led C&D Technologies' Americas business.

    

About AeroVironment, Inc.


AeroVironment is a technology solutions provider that designs, develops,

      produces, supports and operates an advanced portfolio of Unmanned

      Aircraft Systems (UAS) and electric transportation solutions. The

      company's electric-powered, hand-launched unmanned aircraft systems

      generate and process data to deliver powerful insight, on demand, to

      people and enterprises engaged in military, public safety and commercial

      activities around the world. AeroVironment's electric transportation

      solutions include a comprehensive suite of electric

      vehicle (EV) charging systems, installation and network services for

      consumers, automakers, utilities and government agencies, power

      cycling and test systems for EV developers and industrial

      electric vehicle charging systems for commercial fleets. More

      information about AeroVironment is available at www.avinc.com.

    

Safe Harbor Statement



      Certain statements in this press release may constitute "forward-looking

      statements" as that term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation

      Reform Act of 1995. These statements are made on the basis of current

      expectations, forecasts and assumptions that involve risks and

      uncertainties, including, but not limited to, economic, competitive,

      governmental and technological factors outside of our control, that may

      cause our business, strategy or actual results to differ materially from

      those expressed or implied. Factors that could cause actual results to

      differ materially from the forward-looking statements include, but are

      not limited to, our ability to perform under existing contracts and

      obtain additional contracts; our reliance on sales to the U.S.

      government; changes in the timing and/or amount of government spending;

      changes in the supply and/or demand and/or prices for our products and

      services; changes in the regulatory environment; the activities of

      competitors; failure of the markets in which we operate to grow; failure

      to expand into new markets; failure to develop new products or integrate

      new technology with current products; and general economic and business

      conditions in the United States and elsewhere in the world. For a

      further list and description of such risks and uncertainties, see the

      reports we file with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including

      our most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K and Quarterly Reports on

      10-Q. We do not intend, and undertake no obligation, to update any

      forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information,

      future events or otherwise.

    


      For additional media and information, please follow us at:

    


      Facebook: http://www.facebook.com/#!/pages/AeroVironment-Inc/91762492182Twitter:

      http://www.twitter.com/aerovironmentYouTube:

      http://www.youtube.com/user/AeroVironmentIncGoogle+:

      https://plus.google.com/100557642515390130818/posts



View source version on businesswire.com: http://www.businesswire.com/news/home/20160404005632/en/

AeroVironment, Inc.Steven Gitlin, +1 (626) 357-9983pr@avinc.com



Source: AeroVironment, Inc.

News Provided by Acquire Media








 